



































ORBS 
POSITION PAPER 

V1.6 

orbs.com 

Public blockchain infrastructure for established consumer applications 

o r b s . c om

V.1.6

Position Paper 

PUBLIC BLOCKCHAIN INFRASTRUCTURE 
FOR ESTABLISHED CONSUMER APPLICATIONS 



 

 

Motivation 5 

The Orbs Vision 5 

Purpose of This Paper 5 

Introduction 7 

Decentralized Consensus 7 

The Blockchain to Rule All Blockchains 8 

A Requirement Driven Approach 8 

The Era of Decentralized Consumer Apps 9 

Why Do Consumer Apps Decentralize 10 

Kin by Kik Interactive - a Case Study 11 

Target Audience for Orbs 14 

Building Through Design Partners 14 

Infrastructure for Decentralized Apps 16 

First Generation (Bitcoin) 16 

Second Generation (Ethereum) 16 

Third Generation (Orbs) 17 

Centralized Infrastructure as a Service 17 

Lessons in Pragmatic Systems Design 18 

The Orbs Platform 20 

Overview 20 

Decentralized-Consensus Compute 20 

Decentralized-Consensus Storage 20 

Consensus as a Service 21 

Design Principles 21 

Service Level Agreement (SLA) 21 

Consumer Scale 22 

Consumer Protection and Regulation 22 

Modern Deployment Paradigms 22 

1 



 

Network Entities 24 

Consumers 24 

Apps 25 

Consensus Nodes 25 

Audit Nodes 26 

The Orbs Ecosystem 27 

Core Infrastructure 27 

Specialized Infrastructure 27 

Infrastructure Marketplace 28 

The ORBS Token 29 

Overview 29 

Billing Subsystem 29 

Programmable Fee Models 30 

Economy Incentives 30 

Token Implementation 32 

Architecture 33 

To Fork or Not to Fork 33 

Polyglot Microservices 33 

Specification as Code 34 

Meta Programming 35 

Universal Addressing 36 

Network Owned Secrets 36 

Orbs Architecture 38 

Infrastructure Layers and Services 38 

Resources Pools vs. Virtual Chains 40 

Consensus 42 

Pragmatic Decentralization and Trust 42 

Healthy Distribution of Power 43 

Real-time Validation Rights 43 

Governance Decision Rights 43 

2 



 

Proof of Work 45 

Proof of Stake 46 

Permissioned Models 47 

A Layered Approach 48 

Helix Consensus Algorithm 49 

Finality of Consensus Results 49 

Ordering of Opaque Transactions 50 

Separation of Ordering From Validation 50 

Fast Consensus by Committees 50 

Efficient Leader Election by Randomized Sort 50 

Node Reputation System 51 

Service Level Agreement (SLA) 52 

Industry Standard 52 

CryptoKitties - a Case Study 52 

SLA in a Decentralized Context 54 

Predictable Fee Models 55 

Dedicated, Reserved and On-Demand Resources 56 

Virtual Chains and Blockchain Virtualization 56 

Design Principles 58 

Consumer Scale 59 

Throughput and Latency 59 

Scalable Fee Models 60 

Ever-Growing Storage 61 

Light Clients 62 

Separation of Ordering and Validation 62 

Efficient Consensus via Committees 64 

Sharding via Blockchain Virtualization 65 

Elastic Capacity 66 

Consumer Protection and Regulation 67 

Regulatory Evolution 67 

3 



Established Consumer Brands 67 

Consumer Protection 68 

Decentralized Ledger Security 68 

Censorship and Front-running 70 

Compliance Protocols 71 

Privacy and AML 71 

The White Chain 72 

Modern Deployment Paradigms 73 

Network Governance 73 

Evergreen Nodes 74 

Gradual Migrations 75 

Upgradable Contracts 76 

Multi Chain Hybrids 76 

Polyglot Cross-Chain Contracts 78 

Designing for Consumers 79 

Brands and Trust 79 

Mobile and Web Clients 79 

Consumer Patterns of Network Access 80 

Infrastructure Implications of Churn 81 

Consumer Apps and Open Source 81 

The Problem of Private Keys 82 

Decentralized Secret Bearing 83 

The Orbs Federation 84 

Pre-launch Design Partners 84 

Governance 85 

Definitions 86 

Legal Disclaimer 87 

4 



Motivation 

The Orbs Vision 
By 2020, large scale consumer applications will have transitioned to the blockchain to bring                           
decentralized services to billions of users worldwide. We see the beginning of this trend today                             
as more and more established consumer brands, such as Kodak, Kik and Telegram, are                           
launching new decentralized businesses and reinventing themselves in this space. 

The masses of mainstream consumers present a unique combination of challenges that                       
general-purpose blockchain solutions find difficult to adequately meet. We see a need to                         
provide these decentralized consumer apps with an infrastructure solution that addresses the                       
multitude of requirements for making this transition possible. 

Until now, established consumer brands have been forced to either avoid blockchain                       
technology altogether; defocus and develop their own custom infrastructure in-house; or settle                       
for off-the-shelf solutions that don’t scale, fee structures that break business models and a                           
degree of liability that a real-world business cannot accept. 

The Orbs project envisions commoditizing blockchain infrastructure for large scale consumer                     
applications. We envision a fully decentralized public platform where consumer brands feel                       
comfortable to operate nodes and take part in a decentralized and balanced ecosystem, one                           
that makes this transition easier for the industry as a whole. The platform will be complete                               
with a core product experience inspired by well-established infrastructure solutions such as                       
Amazon Web Services (AWS) and speak in familiar terminology like Service Level Agreements                         
(SLA) and dedicated resources. 

Purpose of This Paper 
We see a stark difference between a ​white paper and a ​position paper​. A white paper takes a                                   
complex problem and revolves around the solution to that problem. A position paper revolves                           
around the problem itself. It discusses the problem and provides an arguable opinion on how                             

5 

MOTIVATION



it should be approached. This paper is designed to be the position paper for Orbs - discussing                                 
the problem of consumer-oriented blockchain infrastructure and how we approach it. 

There’s a tendency in the blockchain space to launch projects with a celebratory technical                           
white paper. We believe that solving complex problems requires a mix of multiple solutions                           
over time and that these solutions evolve. Accordingly, the Orbs project will publish a set of                               
white papers, each dealing with a different aspect of the solution. These white papers will                             
evolve; some may become obsolete and some may be replaced with different ones, as we                             
continue to better understand the problems we’re facing. 

Nevertheless, we don’t believe a white paper is the first piece of the puzzle. The first piece is                                   
articulating the problem, explaining exactly what we’re trying to solve and why - a stable guide                               
in the turbulent waters of momentary innovation. This position paper will carve the specific                           
niche in blockchain infrastructure that the Orbs platform is focused on. It will then go into                               
details regarding the main requirements we’re optimizing towards and the various tradeoffs                       
we’re prepared to make. This paper will also introduce some of the solutions we’re working on,                               
with dedicated technical white papers to be published separately about each one. 

6 



Introduction 

Decentralized Consensus 
There’s no argument that cryptocurrencies have an exciting air of disruption about them, with                           
the potential to change core aspects of everyday life, like creating ​programmable economies​.                         
It’s difficult to measure the degree of disruption objectively but it is possible to examine the                               
indicators that historically coincide with profound technological innovation. 

One of the largest disruptions of modern time was without a doubt the birth of the Internet,                                 
which created the ability to interconnect the world digitally in a matter of milliseconds. An                             
indicator coinciding with this event was the dot-com bubble of 1997-2001, a period of                           
excessive market speculation and wild growth. There are similarities between this period to                         
today’s crypto bubble and evidence that the crypto bubble is even greater in magnitude . While                             1

we should approach bubbles cautiously, they are a requirement for extreme growth over a                           
short period of time. Many companies did not survive the collapse of the dot-com bubble, but                               
the giants of today’s digital world, companies like Amazon and Google, emerged from the                           
wreckage. We believe that the key for doing the same is planting firm roots in substantiated                               
value and ignoring hype in general. These are guiding principles for Orbs and will be covered in                                 
greater depth throughout this paper. 

If the Internet was the technological breakthrough driving the dot-com era, what is the                           
underlying technology driving today’s crypto era? Cryptocurrencies are not a technology unto                       
themselves but ​applications​ of a technology. This technology is ​decentralized consensus​. 

Decentralized ​systems are distributed systems where a group of independent but equally                       
privileged nodes operate on local information to accomplish global goals. These systems lack                         
a central controller that exercises governance, supervision and control over the system, thus                         
allowing power to be distributed over the network in a more uniform and fair manner.                             
Distributed systems are not new, with applications such as Napster driving the peer-to-peer                         
boom of the early 2000s. 

1 ​http://cnbc.com/2017/08/31/bitcons-nearly-five-fold-climb-in-2017-looks-similar-to-tech-bubble-surge 

7 

INTRODUCTION

https://www.cnbc.com/2017/08/31/bitcons-nearly-five-fold-climb-in-2017-looks-very-similar-to-tech-bubble-surge.html


Consensus is a shared view of reality that is agreed upon between different parts of a system.                                 
Consider the most trivial example of a consumer application - an instant messenger where                           
users can chat amongst themselves. This system requires consensus to operate, allowing                       
every user to authenticate and speak only on their own behalf. All members must reach a                               
shared view of reality regarding which user is which, who owns every username and so forth.                               
The consensus property is very easy to achieve in centralized systems, where a single                           
governing body is trusted by all members to define this shared reality. 

Whereas decentralized systems are easy to build without consensus and consensus is easy                         
to achieve in centralized systems, maintaining both properties in the same system proves                         
difficult. This is the underlying innovation in the field of decentralized consensus. The ability to                             
build decentralized systems where a group of independent but equally privileged nodes are                         
able to reach a shared view of reality. Cryptocurrencies are an excellent example of an                             
application that requires such a system, where agreement upon the ledger of transactions and                           
balances can be reached without a governing body. 

The Blockchain to Rule All Blockchains 
The term blockchain originates from a core implementation construct of cryptocurrencies                     
such as Bitcoin and refers to a continuously growing list of records, called blocks, which are                               
linked and secured using cryptography. This chain of blocks holds the journal of all                           
transactions in the network and forms the distributed ledger. The term blockchain has                         
become synonymous with the core technology providing the infrastructure for such                     
applications. 

Building the next generation of blockchain infrastructure has become a fertile ground for                         
innovation and dozens of teams are currently racing to deliver the “best” one. Many of these                               
projects position themselves, sometimes even explicitly, as candidates for ​the blockchain to                       
rule all blockchains​. We believe that this mentality is flawed. 

History shows that silver bullets are rare: complex problems are not solved by a single, simple                               
solution. We believe that there will be no blockchain to rule all blockchains. A general-purpose                             
blockchain can only optimize for the lowest common denominator. Therefore, the first step                         
towards building a practical blockchain is articulating a clear use case - defining a real world                               
need that this blockchain infrastructure is attempting to resolve and determining whether or                         
not a market for this need actually exists. 

A Requirement Driven Approach 
The first question asked when presented with a new blockchain infrastructure is “what’s the                           
key differentiator?” More often than not, the answer to this question is a groundbreaking new                             
algorithm, a breakthrough based on years of academic research, that takes some arbitrary                         

8 



 

narrow aspect of the problem and revolutionizes the industry by addressing it in an innovative                             
way. That’s not how we believe Orbs should be built. 

We’ve decided early on that we’re going to take a more humble approach. We’re not going to                                 
start with the solution; instead, we’re going to start with the problem. Our first step would be to                                   
outline a clear need that current blockchain infrastructure solutions fail to adequately meet.                         
Next, find actual businesses, real customers for this missing infrastructure. Ideally, the next                         
step would be to work side by side with some of these businesses. In the beginning, attempt                                 
with them to rely on existing blockchain solutions for their production use case; we need this                               
process to understand the practical limitations of these solutions, where the actual challenges                         
stem from, which features solve real problems and which are merely nice to have. 

Our mission, apparently, has become to find ​design partners​. 

This would make Orbs a requirement-driven blockchain. Consider this as a key differentiator.                         
The initial design should emerge in an iterative manner with each piece added only to resolve                               
the most pressing requirement of our design partners. Our experience from building                       
production systems in the pre-blockchain age teaches us that this approach is more likely to                             
deliver superior and pragmatic solutions. It is definitely more efficient than concocting a                         
solution first, designing a system around it and then scrambling to find a market fit. 

A good relevant example is the emergence of the modern cloud, the de facto standard for                               
infrastructure as a service today. AWS, the first and leading cloud provider, emerged from                           2

Amazon’s pressing e-commerce needs for solid internal systems to deal with the hyper                         
growth it was experiencing. 

The Era of Decentralized Consumer Apps 
The crypto space is growing rapidly with more and more businesses joining the ecosystem                           
every day. The first wave of businesses included mostly early adopters, newly formed                         
crypto-first businesses or small existing businesses looking to experiment with the                     
technology. The consumer apps among them, products like Steemit, Gnosis and Augur,                       
achieved very mild success . This is not surprising since consumer markets are notoriously                         3

difficult to penetrate, especially when dealing with complex technologies that even the tech                         
savvy find challenging to master. 

We’re starting to see the next wave of businesses join this maturing ecosystem. This wave                             
consists of established businesses making the transition to blockchain, whether it’s                     
established venture capital firms joining the crypto funding landscape or established                     
companies looking to tokenize. The most interesting among these are mature consumer                       
brands - companies like Telegram, LINE or Kik Interactive, with millions of end users,                           
companies that have successfully penetrated consumer markets outside the blockchain                   

2 ​https://techcrunch.com/2016/07/02/andy-jassys-brief-history-of-the-genesis-of-aws/ 
3 ​https://steemit.com/statistics/@arcange/steemit-statistics-20171117-en 

9 

https://techcrunch.com/2016/07/02/andy-jassys-brief-history-of-the-genesis-of-aws/
https://steemit.com/statistics/@arcange/steemit-statistics-20171117-en


world. The transition for these companies is slow and far from straightforward, mostly                         
because they have so much to lose if the foundations turn out to be inadequate for their                                 
needs. 

It is estimated that the total number of active cryptocurrency end users in the world is 6                                 
million as of 2017. This figure is mind boggling in proportion to the total market cap of                                 4

cryptocurrencies in 2017, which has surpassed 600 billion USD . It is up to these established                             5

consumer brands to make the next giant leap for cryptocurrencies and decentralized                       
technologies and deliver them to the masses. 

Why Do Consumer Apps Decentralize 
Traditionally, established consumer brands have followed a very strict centralized model. The                       
question of their motives comes to mind as more and more of these applications take parts of                                 
their business and decentralize them over the blockchain. Critics may claim that the                         
opportunity to raise funds provides a strong enough incentive for these brands to join this                             
space. Nonetheless, we have a less cynical perspective which reveals a multitude of different                           
reasons. 

Tokens are becoming the standard for the transfer of value in the digital world. They are                               
immune to many of the drawbacks that payments in fiat currencies face in a digital setting.                               
Tokens can be shared instantaneously across borders, removing the need for separate                       
payment solutions per geography. Businesses can receive tokens directly with minimal                     
integration, cutting out middlemen such as payment providers and the hefty fees they charge.                           
Tokens are easier to secure, reducing fees that are traditionally high to offset chargebacks                           
and fraud. Tokens are also well-suited for flexible payment models such as microtransactions                         
and can be incorporated seamlessly into larger systems through their programmable                     
interfaces. 

Tokenization also provides the means to create handcrafted micro economies that obey a set                           
of predefined rules. This allows to design controlled environments where consumer apps can                         
monetize effectively. Monetization has always been difficult for consumer apps, many of                       
which must resort to selling the attention and data of their consumers to advertisers and                             
marketers. The ad-based approach has resulted in advantages almost exclusively for the                       
largest applications, concentrating wealth and power in the hands of the few. 

Token economies today hold billions of dollars in value. Securing so much value on                           
centralized infrastructure is costly because criminals have huge incentive in breaking into it.                         
Decentralized ledgers are easier to secure because no single entity can manipulate the ledger,                           
and in particular, nobody with access to the company’s servers can use this access to steal                               

4 ​https://jbs.cam.ac.uk/faculty-research/centres/alternative-finance/publications/global-cryptocurrency 
5 ​https://coinmarketcap.com/charts/ 

10 

https://jbs.cam.ac.uk/faculty-research/centres/alternative-finance/publications/global-cryptocurrency
https://coinmarketcap.com/charts/


money from consumers. In addition, multiple parties constantly audit the integrity of the                         
ledger and can identify discrepancies from the agreed upon protocol. 

Tokenization also allows consumer apps to distribute the economic value created in them,                         
particularly to their users. This ensures that users are fairly compensated for the value they                             
create within the app. This model resonates well in an environment where monetization is                           
normally not in the best interest of the consumer. 

Another benefit of decentralization for consumer apps is the ability to band companies                         
together as equals. The consumer space is slowly consolidating into the hands of the giants                             
like Facebook and Google. Decentralization provides the means for the long tail of companies                           
to align together and create combined ecosystems where no single entity can skew the                           
balance of power in its favor. These ecosystems can even carry on after some of the                               
individual companies cease to exist, allowing consumers to have direct ownership of the value                           
they hold, without relying on the services of others. 

Kin by Kik Interactive - a Case Study 
Kik Interactive Ltd. is an established consumer brand based in Canada and the US with the                               6

mission of connecting the world through chat. Kik Interactive has over 150 employees in 4                             
offices around the world and is a member of the Fortune Unicorn List of private companies                               
with valuations of over one billion dollars. Its main consumer product is Kik Messenger , a                             7

popular mobile chat app and the fifth most-searched term in the iOS App Store . Kik has been                                 8

operating for 9 years and has raised $120 million to date from private venture capital. 

Kik is the classic example of a consumer product created with the optimistic vision of a fully                                 
connected world, brought on by the technological disruptions of the dot-com and mobile eras.                           
It’s a world where a group of friends, at the University of Waterloo in this case, can band                                   
together and create an app in their garage that will eventually find its way to 100 million users. 

Over the years, Kik has been searching for a sustainable monetization model that does not                             
compromise user experience or privacy. Nevertheless, it is operating in a world where digital                           
services have been organized largely around an attention-based economy and monetization                     
through advertising. The problem is, that the online advertising market is structured in a very                             
unfair way: bigger players have more data on their users, and are therefore able to sell                               
advertisements at much higher prices. This means that smaller apps don’t enjoy revenues                         
that are proportional to their size. Instead, revenue resembles a pattern of exponential growth: 

6 ​https://www.kik.com/ 
7 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kik_Messenger 
8 ​https://www.kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Whitepaper_V1_English.pdf 

11 

https://www.kik.com/
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Kik_Messenger
https://www.kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Whitepaper_V1_English.pdf


When the market is structured in this way, a very large share of the ads market go to the few                                       
big platforms who also enjoy the highest profit margins. They then use their market                           
dominance to set the market prices to a level that ensures smaller platforms don’t make a                               
profit, but the bigger ones still do. This creates a long tail of small products unable to sustain                                   
themselves and a small number of extremely profitable giants. 

This revenue graph means that Kik will eventually struggle to become profitable. Despite the                           
odds and reaching an impressive number of users, Kik was struggling to sustain itself. This                             
problem is not unique to Kik. ​Almost every digital service that sits on the “wrong” side of the                                   
exponent - which unfortunately includes almost everybody due to the way exponents behave -                           
struggles to monetize. This is not surprising, as the 1% usually have 99% of the power. That’s                                 
just how the world works. 

This problem worsens every year. One could say that the exponent is getting steeper. The                             
world is consolidating, making it harder and harder to compete with the giants and less likely                               
that a group of university friends trying to change the world will be successful. The result is                                 
disadvantageous for consumers as consolidation reduces market competition and hurts                   
innovation. 

Kik Interactive has taken on the challenge to change this reality. Many have tried and failed to                                 
solve the monetization problem of consumer apps in the last decade, but Kik believes that                             
only a disruption in the magnitude of the one that created the Internet will suffice. This                               
disruption is finally upon us: Cryptocurrencies, or the technology of decentralized consensus,                       
to be exact. 

With this mission in mind, Kik Interactive has launched Kin, a decentralized ecosystem of                           
digital services for daily life based on a new token named KIN.  

12 



This token makes a new economy possible where digital services can monetize without direct                           
reliance on advertising. The Kin white paper sets forth the vision for the Kin Ecosystem, of                               9

aligning incentives of developers and consumers through the Kin Rewards Engine (KRE) .                       10

Kik’s Token Distribution Event (TDE) was held in September 2017, selling almost $100 million                           
in KIN tokens. 

We can use our graph example from before to demonstrate the general motivation behind Kin: 

The red line in the graph above designates present economic behavior. The blue line is what a                                 
fair economy would look like. If I am a digital service developer with a service that is 1000                                   
times less popular than Facebook, I expect to make 1/1000 of Facebook’s revenue. This                           
would mean that I am still able to sustain myself because my company is also 1/1000 of the                                   
size of Facebook Inc. While it is true that the 1% usually have 99% of the power, in this case,                                       
the 99% would prefer to move to a world that behaves like the line in blue. 

Through the Kin Reward Engine, developers of digital services are incentivized in relation to                           
their contribution to the overall adoption of Kin. Kin thus constitutes a powerful tool to change                               
the natural behavior of the economy that results in a ​linear relationship between the number of                               
users and revenue. 

This also explains why consumer apps favor decentralization. The KIN token economy could                         
generate substantial value. Securing a central ledger from theft, hacking or embezzlement is                         
difficult and expensive. With a decentralized ledger, no one can manipulate the ledger by                           
gaining access to the company’s servers. This provides a greater degree of protection to its                             
users. In addition, the success of the Kin ecosystem depends on the number of digital                             

9 ​https://www.kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Whitepaper_V1_English.pdf 
10 ​https://kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Rewards_Engine_RFC.pdf 

13 

https://www.kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Whitepaper_V1_English.pdf
https://kinecosystem.org/static/files/Kin_Rewards_Engine_RFC.pdf


services that band together. Cooperation between competing digital services would have been                       
next to impossible without creating a decentralized equilibrium where all parties are equal. 

Target Audience for Orbs 
The Orbs platform is focused on providing blockchain infrastructure for large scale consumer                         
applications. Successful digital brands in the consumer space have access to millions of end                           
users, usually through websites and mobile apps. The majority of these consumer brands are                           
already established and have amassed their user base before the blockchain era. The Orbs                           
platform provides the infrastructure for these consumer brands to build emerging                     
decentralized businesses for the benefit of their users, such as the ability to utilize blockchain                             
technology, tokenize, integrate smart contracts and more. 

Working with a distinct and well-defined target audience also means the requirements and                         
goals are clear. Orbs doesn’t try to be a general-purpose blockchain, it’s built from the ground                               
up for the consumer app market and the very specific set of requirements it entails. 

Building Through Design Partners 

Orbs is being designed using a strict requirements-driven approach. The founding team has                         
been working closely with some of the leading consumer brands that are in the process of                               
transitioning to the blockchain and has been relying on them as design partners. By choosing                             
partners representing different business domains, we are ensuring that the requirements we                       
are exposed to cover the essentials for a truly practical solution. 

In the domain of social/messaging, we are working with Kin by Kik Interactive. The Orbs team                               
has been advising the Kin TDE from the beginning and some of its key members have been                                 
employed by the Kin engineering team on its journey to implement Kin using existing                           
infrastructure solutions. Kik has been vocal about the challenges identified throughout the                       
process which became a cornerstone to the Orbs design. Orbs maintains a close                         11

relationship with the Kin engineering team, cooperating both on architecture and                     
development. 

In the domain of payments/settlements, we are working with Zooz Labs and PumaPay.                         
Founded in 2010, Zooz is a leading solution provider for cross-border payments with                         
customers such as Wix.com, Burberry and Gett. Zooz Labs is introducing a protocol for                           
blockchain-based cross-border payments in prevailing consumer-oriented mobile wallet apps.                 
PumaPay is working on a blockchain-based pull-payment protocol - a decentralized alternative                       
to PayPal. Among its launch partnerships are businesses interacting with hundreds of millions                         
of users and processing billions of dollars worth of payments, such as lifestyle media                           
company FashionTV and adult media giant Vivid Entertainment.  

11 ​https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5 

14 

https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5


In the domain of online advertising, we are working with Zinc - a blockchain-based advertising                             
protocol that improves efficiency in the ad industry by increasing user data transparency,                         
delivering a better user experience, and removing the impact of bad actors. Zinc is working                             
with IronSource as a design partner, one of the largest advertising technology providers in the                             
world. IronSource, founded in 2011, has a global reach of over 1 billion users a month, giving                                 
Zinc the potential to exponentially scale to become the next advertising protocol standard. 

Another notable domain is business intelligence. Our team has been cooperating closely with                         
Endor, a business intelligence technology vendor, with customers such as Coca-Cola, Walmart                       
and MasterCard. While traditionally not a consumer-oriented domain, Endor is bringing                     
predictive business analytics to end users, developing a decentralized platform with a                       
Google-like interface for AI queries. 

Together, these companies and their partners represent a network containing hundreds of                       
millions of consumers, billions of app installs and billions of USD in annual revenues. Our team                               
has been working closely with these projects since their inception, helping design their                         
solutions both on and off the Orbs network. 

15 



Infrastructure for Decentralized Apps 

First Generation (Bitcoin) 
Bitcoin is considered the first generation of blockchain technology. The building blocks used                         
to create Bitcoin, such as the concept of Proof of Work, have predated Bitcoin by several                               
years. Nevertheless, Bitcoin is unique in its combination of these elements to solve the                           
problem of consensus on a decentralized ledger in an open, streamlined, elegant and secure                           
way. The public success of Bitcoin should not be attributed to its underlying technology,                           
interesting as it may be, but to its product. After all, Bitcoin is primarily an ​application and not                                   
an ​infrastructure​. This application has been so successful, in fact, that cryptocurrency has                         
become ​the​ killer app for blockchain technology. 

One of the greatest feats of Bitcoin is alleviating any doubt as to whether blockchain                             
technology is indeed working or that it is secure and solid enough to hold assets of great value                                 

. Furthermore, it can be trusted to a greater degree than any infrastructure solution                         12

previously offered by any authority. It did so in a remarkable way by creating an environment                               
free of central governance, where all nodes are equal but without assuming they are all                             
honest. And still, it successfully manages an entire financial system worth billions. 

Bitcoin naturally has its flaws as a first generation technology. Problems like excessive fees,                           
long confirmation times and difficult upgrade politics are preventing the system from being                         
used in production for any purpose other than as an electronic alternative to stored gold. 

Second Generation (Ethereum) 
Ethereum is considered the second generation of blockchain technology. Its primary                     
innovation was the separation between the ​application and the ​infrastructure layers. Ethereum                       
has little application on its own, but it provides a solid base for application developers to                               
create their own decentralized applications over the blockchain. This is done by writing smart                           

12 ​https://coinmarketcap.com/currencies/bitcoin/ 

16 

INFRASTRUCTURE FOR DECENTRALIZED APPS

https://coinmarketcap.com/currencies/bitcoin/


contracts , immutable pieces of software running in a decentralized manner over all the                         13

nodes in the network under the promise of full consensus upon the execution of its terms. 

Before the age of Ethereum, decentralized applications like Bitcoin were implemented as a                         
monolith, mixing both the application and the custom-fitted infrastructure for running this                       
specific application. The boom of decentralized application development in recent years can                       
be largely attributed to this separation of application from its infrastructure, as the barriers for                             
their implementation have been greatly reduced. 

Naturally, as the first project to make this giant leap forward, significant parts of Ethereum                             
remain as working proofs of concept but ultimately unable to run actual businesses on                           
production . 14

Third Generation (Orbs) 
Now that the foundations of the technology have been firmly set, the race is on to create the                                   
next generation of blockchain infrastructure that finally allows real-world businesses to                     
decentralize. The third generation of blockchain infrastructure projects will go beyond the                       
smart contract technology proof of concept and into practical business applications in real                         
world production environments. The question is no longer whether this is possible, but what’s                           
the most efficient way. 

We’ve witnessed how wide the gap is between proof-of-concept and production-ready after                       
working with the Kin engineering team on bringing Kin to production over Ethereum .                         15

Ethereum itself is going through transformations to evolve into a third generation project, with                           
core changes like the gradual switch to Proof of Stake (PoS). Other than that, the number of                                 
third generation candidates is impressive, with excellent projects focusing on different                     
aspects of the challenge, like EOS  and Cardano . 16 17

There isn’t one blockchain to rule all blockchains. We’re hopeful that many of these projects                             
will reach fruition and each provide a best of its class solution for a distinct scenario. 

Centralized Infrastructure as a Service 
Solutions for Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS) for centralized apps have matured significantly                         
over the last 10 years. Leading cloud providers like Amazon Web Services (AWS) , Microsoft                           18

Azure or Google Cloud Platform have become the de facto standard in the industry. There’s a                               

13 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Smart_contract 
14 ​https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5 
15 ​https://medium.com/kin-contributors/ethereum-challenges-while-launching-iplv2-8a33e1ba5a64 
16 ​https://eos.io/ 
17 ​https://whycardano.com/ 
18 ​https://aws.amazon.com/ 

17 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Smart_contract
https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5
https://medium.com/kin-contributors/ethereum-challenges-while-launching-iplv2-8a33e1ba5a64
https://eos.io/
https://whycardano.com/
https://aws.amazon.com/


great deal that can be learned from these services when designing our IaaS solution for                             
decentralized​ apps. 

Almost all established consumer apps use cloud services as their infrastructure for                       
centralized IT services. Just as companies like Airbnb , Netflix and Lyft rely on AWS to                             19 20 21

provide the infrastructure for their centralized businesses, we expect companies with                     
decentralized applications to rely on the Orbs platform to provide infrastructure for their                         
decentralized businesses. 

Another observation: emphasis on having a well-rounded ​product is sorely lacking in existing                         
blockchain infrastructure solutions. What exactly is a well-rounded product for a blockchain?                       
This question is often asked in emerging fields which have yet to produce concrete business                             
applications. Consider, for example, the question of fee structure. Should blockchain fees be                         
paid by the sender of a transaction or by its recipient? Or maybe by a third party? Should the                                     
fee be paid per transaction or per month with a subscription? Should the fee be predictable                               
and constant or market-determined? These are all questions that have strong influence over                         
the product - how to design the user experience when working with the infrastructure. 

It seems that so far, the answers to most of these questions in existing solutions did not start                                   
from a product discussion, but from security, fairness or game theoretical considerations.                       
What would a real business using this infrastructure prefer? A consumer app may want to                             
subsidize its users’ infrastructure costs. In addition, it may probably want to plan the budget                             
for these expenditures in advance. 

There’s rarely a need to reinvent the wheel: the product for decentralized infrastructure is not                             
materially different from that of centralized infrastructure like AWS. Mature platforms like                       
AWS provide us with practices that are proven after years of calibration to fit the needs of                                 
actual businesses. 

Lessons in Pragmatic Systems Design 
We’ve made several observations that are important from a pragmatic standpoint from                       
working closely with our design partners on architecting an expansive decentralized system.                       
First, a decentralized system doesn’t need to be decentralized end-to-end. Depending on your                         
goals, significant parts of the system can remain centralized. This has a great effect on                             
efficiency since centralized infrastructure is usually significantly faster and cheaper than a                       
decentralized counterpart. 

Consider an obvious example: a system that transacts video content securely over the                         
blockchain. A naive approach would be to store the video data on blockchain storage, but                             
doing so would be inefficient and immensely expensive. The system will perform better and be                             

19 ​https://aws.amazon.com/solutions/case-studies/airbnb/ 
20 ​https://media.netflix.com/en/company-blog/completing-the-netflix-cloud-migration 
21 ​https://aws.amazon.com/solutions/case-studies/lyft/ 

18 

https://aws.amazon.com/solutions/case-studies/airbnb/
https://media.netflix.com/en/company-blog/completing-the-netflix-cloud-migration
https://aws.amazon.com/solutions/case-studies/lyft/


cheaper to operate by orders of magnitude if the raw video data is stored on cheaper and                                 
faster centralized storage and served through a CDN, while the blockchain is only used to                             
distribute hash codes and keys. 

Another important observation is that real-life systems often span over more than one                         
blockchain. We’ve mentioned before that there’s no one blockchain to rule all blockchains.                         
Different blockchain implementations are better suited for different goals, even in the same                         
application. 

Immediately after its TDE, Kin launched as an ERC20 token over Ethereum. After                         
understanding that Ethereum will not be able to hold the transaction throughput and fee                           
efficiency required for a consumer app with millions of transactions per day, the project                           
analyzed migrating to an optimized infrastructure solution - such as the Orbs platform. This                           
migration would have a negative effect on some existing users as ERC20 is currently better                             
integrated into the ecosystem of exchanges, wallets (including availability of hardware                     
wallets) and so forth. Whereas Orbs is a great consumer platform, Ethereum is currently better                             
suited for professional asset management and exchange. An ideal solution would be to enjoy                           
the benefits of both by making the token available on both platforms with two-way portability                             
using atomic swaps . 22

22 An example of atomic swap mechanism: ​https://en.bitcoin.it/wiki/Atomic_cross-chain_trading 

19 

https://en.bitcoin.it/wiki/Atomic_cross-chain_trading


The Orbs Platform 

Overview 
The Orbs platform is a decentralized, open and transparent network providing public blockchain 
Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS) for large scale consumer applications. As the trend for 
decentralized businesses continues to rise, we expect more and more established consumer 
brands to take advantage of the new opportunities decentralization presents and start making the 
transition to blockchain. Orbs provides the cloud infrastructure to run these decentralized 
applications and facilitate this transition.

The three primary infrastructure offerings of the Orbs platform include consensus-based 
decentralized compute services, consensus-based decentralized storage services and Consensus 
as a Service (CaaS).

Decentralized-Consensus Compute 
Compute services enable developers of decentralized applications to run their apps over the 
network and execute their code on the various nodes. Applications are executed in a fully 
decentralized and secure way over multiple independent nodes. The results of execution undergo 
consensus to make sure a single coherent outcome emerges. Compute services are similar in 
spirit to centralized IaaS services like AWS EC2 or even AWS Lambda, but use blockchain 
technologies. In the blockchain world, compute services are similar in principle to the execution of 
smart contracts over Ethereum. 

Decentralized-Consensus Storage 
Storage services enable developers of decentralized applications to store data over the network. 
Data is replicated and sharded between multiple independent nodes and stored securely in a fully 
decentralized manner. Storage enforces data to be in consensus, making

23 ​https://aws.amazon.com/ec2/ 
24 ​https://aws.amazon.com/lambda/ 
25 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shard_(database_architecture) 

20 

 THE ORBS PLATFORM

https://aws.amazon.com/ec2/
https://aws.amazon.com/lambda/
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Shard_(database_architecture)


sure there are no inconsistencies between nodes. Storage services are similar in spirit to                           
centralized IaaS services like AWS S3 or even AWS DynamoDB . From a blockchain                         26 27

perspective, storage services are similar in principle to storing data on the blockchain itself in                             
Ethereum, or on IPFS . 28

Consensus as a Service 

Since the Orbs platform is completely decentralized and comprised of independent nodes                       
owned or operated by different organizations, the ability to reach consensus between these                         
nodes is a core underlying capability of the network. The consensus layer of Orbs is                             
architected to be modular and allow additional infrastructure layers, such as compute and                         
storage to be built on top of it. It also allows its users to reach consensus independently of the                                     
other services. For example, one might use CaaS to notarize documents, or inputs from                           
decentralized oracles. Using Orbs’ inherent cross-chain connectors, CaaS can even be used to                         
notarize states in other blockchain platforms, or execute atomic swaps between platforms. 

Design Principles 
Orbs is designed in a requirements-driven approach. By working with design partners that are                           
currently operating mass-market applications serving hundreds of millions of users, we’ve                     
been able to distill the following four areas as our focal points: 

Service Level Agreement (SLA) 

SLA is a commitment between the service provider and a service user. Particular aspects of                             
the service - like minimum quality, availability, responsiveness - are agreed upon in advance                           
with detailed mechanisms to guarantee the SLA in practice or compensate the user if the SLA                               
is not met. SLAs are an industry standard in the traditional consumer infrastructure space and                             
are widely used by centralized IaaS platforms like AWS . In Orbs, SLAs are much more than                               29

these traditional written agreements between parties, since they are implemented as a direct                         
part of the protocol and are ​integral to the network design​. 

SLAs are important for consumer apps in order to increase the predictability of the service                             
level. Consumer expectations are high and even small disruptions in the availability of an app                             
causes users to leave. A blockchain platform will bring little value to its applications if it fails to                                   
perform when congested, even if it provides magnificent performance and ultra-low fees. 

26 ​https://aws.amazon.com/s3/ 
27 ​https://aws.amazon.com/dynamodb/ 
28 ​https://github.com/ipfs/ipfs/blob/master/papers/ipfs-cap2pfs/ipfs-p2p-file-system.pdf 
29 ​https://cloudiqtech.com/aws-sla-summary/ 

21 

https://aws.amazon.com/s3/
https://aws.amazon.com/dynamodb/
https://github.com/ipfs/ipfs/blob/master/papers/ipfs-cap2pfs/ipfs-p2p-file-system.pdf
https://cloudiqtech.com/aws-sla-summary/


 

Consumer Scale 

Consumer apps serving millions of end users normally have aggressive scaling demands -                         
primarily for message throughput, message latency and the number of supported users. As a                           
reference, Lyft handles over a million rides per day . If handled over blockchain technology,                           30

each of these rides should consist of several transactions: ordering the ride, driver taking the                             
ride, payment, review etc. Each of these transactions needs to be processed almost                         
immediately to accommodate an efficient transaction between the rider and the driver. Using                         
blockchain terminology, message throughput and latency translate to transaction throughput                   
and confirmation time. 

Consumer scale does not only apply to raw network properties like throughput and latency.                           
Scale influences almost every aspect of platform design. Consider the scalability of the fee                           
model for example. Infrastructure fees with a fixed cost per transaction that scale linearly with                             
the number of transactions provide a poor framework for consumer apps to grow, especially                           
for mass usage patterns like microtransactions. 

Consumer Protection and Regulation 

There is a common misconception, that decentralized networks are unregulatable. In practice,                       
regulation may lag behind fast-paced technological innovation, but its users are ultimately                       
subject to the ruling of regulators and seek its protection when in need. Consumer apps are                               
normally developed by well-defined organizations or companies with clear legal identities,                     
even if they are decentralized. They are subject to regulation, both by governments and by                             
industry bodies (e.g. app stores), and must operate within legal and contractual limits. For                           
established consumer brands, that have much to lose if found noncompliant, regulatory                       
uncertainty is a risk rather than an opportunity. 

Our experience with design partners shows that compliance often becomes the critical path of                           
the roadmap. Technical and infrastructure choices may impact the requirement for                     
government licenses and compliance to app store rules. 

Modern Deployment Paradigms 

Painful lessons in history, such as Bitcoin SegWit2X , have shown how governance plays a                           31

critical role in the practical success of a decentralized system and its ability to keep improving                               
over time. We consider governance and the orderly process for the continuous evolution of the                             
protocol a first-class citizen in the design of Orbs. Incentives for evergreen nodes are                           
constructed into the very base of the ORBS token economy.  

30 ​https://blog.lyft.com/posts/one-million-rides-a-day 
31 ​https://www.coindesk.com/2x-called-off-bitcoin-hard-fork-suspended-lack-consensus/ 

22 

https://blog.lyft.com/posts/one-million-rides-a-day
https://www.coindesk.com/2x-called-off-bitcoin-hard-fork-suspended-lack-consensus/


The challenge of smart contract immutability has also become important with ordeals such as                           
the aftermath of the Parity multisig bug on Ethereum . Smart contracts could use some local                             32

governance, to be able to adapt to extreme situations without requiring intervention of the                           
governing bodies (or the governing DAOs). 

Furthermore, our experience with real-world production at scale also shows that it is                         
impractical for a production system to deploy major changes to the network as forks, going                             
from 0% to 100% at the flick of a switch. Modern deployment strategies require the ability to                                 
deploy changes gradually (5% to 20%, then to 50%, etc.) with constant monitoring and the                             
ability to rollback. The system must also be allowed to deploy multiple orthogonal changes                           
side by side as independent experiments or else development will have to be serial and slow                               
down significantly. 

32 ​https://blog.comae.io/the-280m-ethereums-bug-f28e5de43513 

23 

https://blog.comae.io/the-280m-ethereums-bug-f28e5de43513


Network Entities 
Orbs is a blockchain infrastructure for large scale consumer apps. As such, we can categorize                             
several distinct types of entities participating in the network: 

Consumers 

These are the end users in the network who use the apps that are running on top of it. They                                       
would make up the vast majority of wallet holders for currency-based products. In general, we                             
can assume they number in the hundreds of millions. Consumers will likely gain access to the                               
network by using a mobile app or a website. Consumers do not have direct access to the Orbs                                   
network and do not operate nodes like in alternative blockchain implementations such as                         
Bitcoin. Consumers’ access to the Orbs network is always provided through an ​app​. 

Usage profiles on mobile apps and websites are characterized by extremely low availability of                           
resources - low computational ability, low memory and low persistent disk storage. Network                         
connectivity is extremely intermittent without any guarantee of how often consumers are                       
online and for how long. Consumer apps in general are also suffering from high churn -                               
meaning users are prone to abandon the app. The number of active users is usually                             
significantly lower than the number of registered users (this number is often as low as 5%).                               
From a regulatory perspective, most of the effort made by regulators is aimed at the                             
protection of consumer interests. 

24 



Apps 

These are the products running on top of the blockchain infrastructure, performing                       
transactions for the benefit of consumers. We can assume a low number of popular                           
consumer apps in the network, in the area of several hundreds. This is mostly because                             
consumer apps are extremely competitive and consumer attention is very difficult to attain.                         
The average mobile consumer does not use more than a dozen mobile apps, although                           
millions of apps exist in app stores. The Orbs platform is naturally optimizing for the                             
high-volume, popular apps. 

Consumer apps are normally developed by well defined organizations or companies with clear                         
legal identities. They are prone to regulation and must operate within legal limits. The majority                             
of consumer brands targeted by the Orbs project are well established and have existed as                             
centralized entities prior to the blockchain era. They currently rely on centralized channels to                           
reach consumers - mobile apps in the app stores, as well as websites with branded domains                               
are fully centralized. 

Resources should be plentiful for consumer apps. Outside of the blockchain world, consumers                         
are known to have high expectations of network scale and responsiveness. We can assume                           
nodes operated by apps will have higher computational ability, more abundant memory and                         
persistent disk space. Network connectivity can also be assumed to be steady and                         
performant. 

Consensus Nodes 

These are the servers that participate in the consensus process and provide the actual                           
compute and storage resources to execute the decentralized apps on top of the blockchain                           
infrastructure. Nodes are owned and operated by various companies and organizations. Each                       
of the organizations may operate multiple nodes.  

Nodes participate in the network by following the protocol, for example by running the Orbs                             
software stack - a freely distributed open source reference implementation introduced by the                         33

Orbs project and maintained by the open source community. The collection of nodes in the                             
network does not have any centralized point of governance and is not owned or controlled by                               
the Orbs project. The number of nodes in the network could be in the same order of                                 
magnitude as the number of apps. In fact, app developers are encouraged to operate nodes in                               
the network and a large similarity between the two groups can be expected. If we account for                                 
node redundancy (a single organization spawning several nodes for robustness) and                     
ecosystem apps like Kin (where an ecosystem of organizations operate an app together), we                           
can expect the number of nodes to be one or two orders of magnitude larger. 

33 ​https://github.com/orbs-network 

25 

https://github.com/orbs-network


Audit Nodes 

These are also servers in the network whose primary purpose is adding another layer of                             
security by public audit of the blockchain. Audit nodes do not take an active part in the                                 
consensus process itself and do not have the capability to write data to storage or close                               
blocks. As such, unreliable behavior by audit nodes, such as intermittent network connection                         
or downtime, does not have a direct negative effect on the overall performance of the network. 

Audit nodes also participate in the network by running the same software stack as consensus                             
nodes. In fact, consensus nodes perform a similar audit process among themselves in parallel                           
to their additional responsibilities. Like consensus nodes, they do not have any centralized                         
point of governance and the collection of audit nodes is not owned or controlled by the Orbs                                 
project. 

The Orbs platform is designed to be public and open for inspection. Any entity and individual is                                 
encouraged to operate audit nodes to help contribute to the network general security. Node                           
operation is also incentivized by the token economic model. We can accommodate a large                           
number of audit nodes in the network which doesn’t necessarily correlate to the number of                             
consensus nodes. 

26 



The Orbs Ecosystem 

Core Infrastructure 
The nodes of the network running the Orbs protocol software stack provide the core                           
competence of the Orbs platform as an infrastructure layer for the developers of                         
consumer-oriented decentralized apps. The core offering includes consensus-based compute,                 
consensus-based storage services and CaaS. The reliance upon Turing-complete languages                   34

as the basis for applications to build upon has been proven as vital by projects like Ethereum.                                 
We consider it unwise for an infrastructure layer to limit the abilities of the applications it                               
carries, as they are the main driver of innovation in the field and their exact requirements                               
cannot be fully anticipated in advance. 

Specialized Infrastructure 
The core competence of the platform only holds the most basic of the building blocks for                               
decentralized apps. These blocks are the most flexible, but experience shows that complex                         
applications require specialized infrastructure as well, that is often built by third parties. 

Decentralized analytics is a concrete example of specialized infrastructure in the Kin use case.                           
Most of the partners in the Kin ecosystem would need a data and business intelligence layer                               
(BI) but don’t have the resources to develop or maintain their own solution. Reliance on a                               
centralized BI solution offered by an established software vendor, such as Sisense or                         35

Tableau , would be problematic: partners should base their most strategic decision-making                     36

on this data, but they cannot trust that the data was not manipulated by whoever controls the                                 
centralized account. A decentralized solution is a better alternative, but currently Kin would                         
have to develop it from scratch. The best option in this case is for an established BI software                                   
vendor to develop a decentralized version of its analytics platform, given that it already                           

34 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turing_completeness 
35 ​https://www.sisense.com/ 
36 ​https://www.tableau.com/ 

27 

 THE ORBS ECOSYSTEM

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Turing_completeness
https://www.sisense.com/
https://www.tableau.com/


 

possesses the domain expertise. The vendor can interface with the Orbs platform to provide                           
the infrastructure to Kin developers via APIs directly accessible from Orbs smart contracts. 

Of course, use-cases for specialized infrastructure are not limited to BI and can also include                             
tools and integration points such as back-office software, oracles, integration ERP/CRM                     
platforms, other types of storage and databases that go beyond a naive key-value store, and                             
much more. 

Infrastructure Marketplace 

Orbs will encourage the formation of an open infrastructure ecosystem of specialized third                         
party solutions, whose participants will provide a ​one stop shop for decentralized application                         
developers. Such a platform will promote decentralized technologies in general and empower                       
specialized complementary infrastructure providers. This ecosystem will establish an                 
economy for services based on the ORBS token where third parties can receive payment using                             
the token for infrastructure solutions they have created. 

The benefit for decentralized application developers is clear - a single integration channel and                           
a common language for all of their decentralized technology needs. This model has been                           
proven to be successful on centralized infrastructure platforms such as AWS Marketplace ,                       37

where third parties are upselling specialized services to AWS customers.   

37 ​https://aws.amazon.com/mp/ 

28 

https://aws.amazon.com/mp/


The ORBS Token 

Overview 
As the native token for the network, the Orbs platform relies on the ORBS token to fuel network                                   
operation and provide the means to pay the fees involved with operation of the consensus                             
layer, execution of smart contracts and consensus-based storage - as these are the three                           
primary services provided by the platform. The fee model serves as incentive for nodes to                             
allocate the necessary resources for operating nodes and ensures an SLA consistent with                         
consumer expectations in term of predictable and stable service, availability, performance and                       
degree of security. In other words, nodes are paid for their services to consumer applications                             
that utilize them. 

The ORBS token is not only the driver for the Orbs core infrastructure, but for the entire                                 
ecosystem built around the Orbs platform. It fuels an ​infrastructure marketplace and serves as                           
the means of payment for third party infrastructure providers which choose to upsell                         
specialized decentralized infrastructure solutions on top of the platform. The billing models for                         
third party decentralized infrastructure solutions must evolve side by side with the                       
infrastructure itself. They also must adapt to the new token economy and rely upon the new                               
dimensions of billing flexibility and the programmability it provides. 

Billing Subsystem 
The Orbs platform makes a clear distinction between ​billing and ​accounting​. Drawing                       
inspiration from centralized infrastructure counterparts such as AWS, where billing uses local                       
fiat currencies in monthly intervals and accounting is tabulated separately per use and on                           
demand with domain-specific metrics (CPU minute for compute or GB for storage and                         
bandwidth). Current-generation blockchain platforms, like Ethereum, do not make this                   
distinction and pair between transactions and their fee payments by requiring that the fee                           
itself be explicitly attached to every transaction. 

The Orbs billing subsystem is based on the ORBS token and provides the flexibility to be                               
performed in monthly intervals as well. Accounting on the Orbs platform is performed                         

29 

THE ORBS TOKEN



 

separately per transaction and on demand with domain-specific metrics (transaction                   
throughput or storage used on chain). This separation adds a degree of flexibility compared to                             
the rigid per-transaction billing and fee model used in most blockchain solutions today. 

Programmable Fee Models 
The Orbs billing subsystem takes infrastructure fee models a step further. Our experience with                           
design partners taught us that different applications prefer to collect fees for infrastructure                         
costs in different ways. Microtransaction-oriented peer-to-peer marketplaces hosted on digital                   
services prefer that the digital services will subsidize the fees for infrastructure and hide them                             
from their end users. Imagine for example a dating app like Tinder where the free model is                                 
crucial for user adoption. In these scenarios, expecting the end user to pay upfront for                             
infrastructure costs makes as much sense as asking end users of an instant messenger to                             
pay for the costs to deliver their own messages. 

This is achieved on Orbs through the introduction of subscriptions. Subscriptions are designed                         
for the developers of decentralized consumer applications which are often responsible for                       
payment for the infrastructure services. This fee model is closer to the pricing model of AWS                               
than to that of Ethereum where the end users pay for infrastructure costs by themselves. 

The Orbs platform is designed to support alternative models as well. Consumer applications                         
where larger sums change hands in a less frequent manner, such as in a decentralized Airbnb                               
for example, may prefer that the party that originates the transaction will pay its fee. They may                                 
even go one step further and make the fee proportional to the amount paid despite the actual                                 
cost of infrastructure being constant. In other products, it makes more sense for the recipient                             
to fund the fees. 

The elegant way to deal with these varying demands is to move elements of this decision                               
from the infrastructure layer to the application layer. By adding a degree of programmability to                             
the fee model, with a smart contract so to speak that specifies how the fee is paid,                                 
applications will maintain the freedom to adjust the fee model to their needs. This also                             
resolves another common challenge on such systems, where the fee is paid with one token                             
and the transaction is performed with another, requiring users to hold balances in both tokens                             
in order to operate. 

Economy Incentives 
One of the main benefits of basing economies on a token instead of traditional fiat currency is                                 
the ability to design an inherent system of incentives that will govern the system and steer it                                 
towards a global set of predefined goals. Bitcoin’s goal, for example, is relying on the native                               
token to incentivize the security of the network and rewards nodes for securely closing blocks                             
with Proof of Work. As of January 2018, Bitcoins with value of approximately $150,000 are                             

30 



distributed every 10 minutes in average for this purpose . This mechanism creates an                         38

economy in Bitcoin where predefined inflation in supply, in addition to the fees paid by users,                               
provide the funding for this self professed global goal. The reward is scheduled to decrease                             
gradually until fees comprise most of the incentive for miners. 

On the Orbs platform, compensation to validators (consensus nodes) is designed to be based                           
entirely on fees (no inflation to the token supply) from the very beginning. As opposed to                               
where Bitcoin stood, we believe the blockchain industry is mature enough to correctly price                           
transactions and validation without the “training wheels” of block rewards. Moreover, whereas                       
fees distribute the burden relative to the amount of actual use of the validation services,                             
generating rewards by inflation levies the cost of the reward on holders of the token relative to                                 
their holding amount. Like usage of property taxes to subsidize trade which creates a skewed                             
market, using inflation to subsidize validation will lead app developers to make uneconomical                         
choices.  

The fees for the Orbs platform are designed with several aims in mind: 

● Incentivize nodes to maintain a high SLA
○ High server availability with no downtime
○ Secure servers against hacking and protect their private keys
○ Fast server hardware with a fast network connection
○ Uphold its commitments to other nodes (like dedication of resources)
○ Regular server maintenance

● Incentivize nodes not to fork the official ORBS token
○ Take part of the official ecosystem and not split apart
○ Participate in the consensus process with other network members
○ Incentivize new consumer brands and organizations to join the network

● Incentivize nodes to evaluate protocol updates regularly and to adopt them
○ Participate in examining protocol changes proposed by the open source                 

community, other federation members and the Orbs project 
○ Run the same protocol as everybody else
○ Enable fast end-of-life cycles for outdated versions, reducing maintenance               

costs 

● Incentivize public audit of the network
○ Public validation that the network is secure
○ Operation of audit nodes that verify conformity to the protocol in real-time
○ Incentivize security researchers to report vulnerabilities instead of exploiting               

them 

38 ​https://www.anythingcrypto.com/guides/bitcoin-mining-block-rewards-2018 

31 

https://www.anythingcrypto.com/guides/bitcoin-mining-block-rewards-2018


 

Other goals for the economy include handling excessive demand gracefully and determining                       
who gets service in this scenario, allowing applications to pay for dedicated resources such as                             
throughput or storage and providing the necessary friction to prevent applications and users                         
from spamming the network and paying for actual node server costs. 

Besides the specific implementation details of the billing subsystem, which controls how                       
collected fees are paid to node operators that provided services across the network, two other                             
core aspects of the Orbs platform are used to implement the economy incentives. The first is                               
a ​reputation system for nodes calculated during the consensus process and facilitated by the                           
platform consensus algorithms such as the ​Helix Consensus Algorithm​. The second is                       
encouraging consumer applications to join the ecosystem and maintain a consensus node.                       
This creates alignment between the incentives of the users of the platform and those of the                               
nodes operating it. 

In addition, in order to bootstrap the platform, the Orbs project is budgeting tokens in reserve                               
for offsetting the entry costs of high profile consumer brands in joining the ecosystem. 

Token Implementation 
On the initial launch of the Orbs platform, we plan to start implementing the billing subsystem                               
over the Ethereum blockchain. We believe that Ethereum is a great initial choice for a practical                               
decentralized billing system mostly due to the extensive amount of third party integrations                         
available for ERC20 tokens in the industry today. These ecosystem integrations with                       
exchanges, third party wallets and hardware wallets are important for the target audience of                           
the billing subsystem, companies and professionals, as they are often required to manage                         
large amounts of money in the form of cryptocurrencies. The current scale limitations of                           
Ethereum are not likely to pose a problem for a billing product since the rate of billing                                 
transactions is low - once per month, and the amounts transferred are high - making the                               
significant fees of Ethereum negligible in this case. These parameters are not very different                           
from that of a wire transfer which is a common means of payment for centralized                             
infrastructure solutions like AWS. 

Implementing the ORBS token on launch as an ERC20 token will also provide a production use                               
case for core platform features of Orbs like ​Polyglot Cross-Chain Contracts​, as the                         
subscription smart contracts running over the Orbs platform will access billing information                       
found on the Ethereum blockchain. This is a great example where a multi chain hybrid makes                               
sense for practical reasons, where two blockchains can be used side by side, focusing on their                               
relative advantages. Towards launch, the resources of the Orbs project are better allocated                         
towards the primary differentiating factors of the platform such as consumer scale and                         
blockchain virtualization. Producing an ecosystem of integrations to exchanges, third party                     
wallets and hardware wallets is not an immediate priority. However, the Orbs project                         
ultimately intends to invest efforts in those as well.   

32 



Architecture 

To Fork or Not to Fork 
One of the first questions that comes to mind when designing a new blockchain infrastructure                             
is whether to fork an existing system as a starting point from which to build. As some                                 
measure of dominance in the industry, we can look at the top 20 tokens on CoinMarketCap ,                               39

excluding Bitcoin and Ethereum, and see that ​over half of the tokens are forks of other popular                                 
tokens. Forking has become a popular method to bootstrap new systems quickly due to the                             
permissive nature of intellectual property in the field. 

Our conclusion, ultimately, was that this decision should depend on what the system is trying                             
to achieve. Let’s assume that we have adequately mapped the space and found an existing                             
blockchain solution. The solution closely implements our conceived ideas, so we consider                       
carrying out a fork. If we suspect that our final result will differ in 30% from said system, we                                     
should fork. If we suspect that our final result will differ in 70%, we shouldn’t. Using this as our                                     
guiding principle, and the lack of maturity of the consumer application sector over blockchain                           
in general (with the first billion dollar consumer brands starting transitioning to blockchain                         
only recently) we have decided not to fork. We are willing to take the short term penalty of                                   
delaying our time to production for the luxury of architecting a system from scratch and                             
designing it for our distinct use case. We want to free ourselves from the potential burdens                               
caused by using an architecture emerging from a different set of requirements. 

Polyglot Microservices 
In the evolution of software systems architecture, traditional systems grew gradually from the                         
initial single program to complete systems. Initially, systems were very simple with all                         
functionality in a single program - what is considered a ​monolith​. As functionality was added                             
to the system, both its codebase and group of contributing developers grew. Gradual growth                           
then lead to decomposition of the project to separate modules following the ​separation of                           

39 ​https://coinmarketcap.com/ 

33 

ARCHITECTURE

https://coinmarketcap.com/


concerns principle . Over the years, well-architected modular systems proved to work well for                         40

scaling functionality and for scaling development teams. 

The Internet revolution brought about new challenges to systems design, as modern systems                         
commonly need to work at massive scales - interfacing with other systems and millions of                             
end users. This leads to changes in both ends of the engineering process. On the development                               
end, the complexity of such systems requires new development paradigms such as                       
refactoring, agile development, continuous deployment and build-measure-learn cycles. On the                   
operational end, it leads to dependence on intricate infrastructure to enable scaling the                         
throughput of overflowing interfaces. Both changes prove to be hard to apply in modular                           
systems that suffer from delicate module interdependencies. This hardship lead to the                       
evolution of ​service-oriented architecture and microservices design methodology, where each                   41

functional component is implemented as a separate, simple and focused product. 

It is easy to observe that most current-generation blockchain platforms are built as monoliths.                           
This not only shows the immature state of their development, but also hampers the ability to                               
evolve and extend the functionality of systems based on these platforms. Moreover, in                         
high-complexity open source projects, the reliance on well-acknowledged libraries and                   
frameworks becomes limited when monoliths are constrained to design choices optimal for                       
just some of their functions. The optimal environments for developing high-performance                     
cryptography are different from those optimal for decentralized storage or from those for high                           
performance networking and so on. The microservices architecture enables a system to be                         
polyglot​, i.e. use different programming languages and frameworks for the different services.                       
Such an approach allows for higher quality services, and better usage of resources such as                             
open source solutions and engineering talent with expertise in relevant domains. 

Specification as Code 
As many software engineers know, a specification document grows stale the minute it gets                           
published - if not before. Therefore, we strive for ​executable specifications that will trigger                           
conspicuous alerts upon failing. By using executable specifications, we ascertain that at no                         
point in time does a codebase diverge from its specification, thus assuring that backwards                           
compatibility and correctness are never compromised. 

The distributed and decentralized nature of a blockchain network makes utilizing executable                       
specifications even more important as the developers have little control over the deployment                         
lifecycle of the services, so rolling back a deployment that broke an API or introduced a bug is                                   
not a viable option. Therefore, our workflow makes extensive use of executable specifications                         

40 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Separation_of_concerns 
41 ​https://martinfowler.com/articles/microservices.html 

34 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Separation_of_concerns
https://martinfowler.com/articles/microservices.html


 

in two major categories: using Protocol Buffers for generating our API schemas, and using                           42

Test-Driven Development (TDD) for achieving highly testable code. 

Protocol Buffers (or protobuf) is an Interface Definition Language (IDL) developed at Google                         
that is programming-language-agnostic and allows defining APIs with backward and                   
forward-compatibility in mind. This creates a clear distinction between the code that defines                         
an API specification and the language and code used to implement it. If a developer changes                               
an implementation in a way that breaks an API, static type-checking will fail the build and an                                 
alert will be sent to the developer immediately upon failure. An added value of using a                               
language-agnostic IDL is as an enabler for writing polyglot microservice, as the API between                           
each pair of microservices is not defined in any specific language.  

Test-Driven Development (TDD) is a methodology in which each required behavior is coded                         
into unit tests before coding the behavior itself. In practice, it means the developer starts by                               
defining the missing behavior, thus creating a test that fails and making sure the failures are                               
as expected. Only then can he go on to implement the code that makes that test pass.                                 
Pursuing this methodology assures that no untested code ever gets into the source code                           
repository. Next, the code is reviewed, but unlike regular code review, the reviewer focuses on                             
validating the correctness of the test (representing what the code does) rather than that of the                               
code itself (how it does it). The tests are written in a semantic language describing the                               
business domain (for instance, transferring some funds between two addresses) rather than                       
the specific implementation; changing the implementation does not affect the test. Practice                       
shows that TDD leads to shorter, more concise code and that the coding process comprises                             
of more cycles of refactoring, thus reducing technical debt. 

Meta Programming 
As the distributed and decentralized nature of a blockchain network imposes engineering                       
challenges that are not present in a traditional deployment, the need arises for creative                           
solutions allowing to circumvent some of these limitations. The Orbs platform makes                       
extensive use of ​meta programming for critical components that will need to support Over The                             
Air (OTA) deployment. Other blockchain networks such as Ethereum offer the concept of                         
smart contracts as a way to execute user-deployable code. The Orbs platform borrows from                           
these ideas and extends them for engineering-facing problems such as deployment and                       
provisioning.  

One interesting area where we make use of meta programming is resource management and                           
provisioning. This is implemented as hot-deployable code not unlike smart contracts, running                       
on an instance of the network itself (which can be thought of as a meta network), controlling                                 
the way resources are provisioned. For example, new virtual machines may automatically be                         
instantiated to increase network capacity when a new member joins the ecosystem -                         
particularly when this member is paying for dedicated resources. Since it is difficult to foresee                             

42 ​https://developers.google.com/protocol-buffers/ 

35 

https://developers.google.com/protocol-buffers/


 

the types of limitations and challenges we might face when onboarding new members to the                             
ecosystem, making this area of the management code OTA-deployable makes a lot of sense.                           
An added value of this approach is that the developers will have immediate visibility into the                               
platform’s runtime, as they will be users of the platform themselves, “eating their own dog                             
food”. 

Another example is a public DNS-like service which enables the resolution of a public address                             
in a more user friendly format (alternatively, it can be used to shuffle between multiple                             
addresses). Implementing such an address resolution mechanism as a smart contract makes                       
it easier to maintain than making it part of the platform’s native core - just as Ethereum chose                                   
to implement ENS as a smart contract. 

Universal Addressing 
Addressing is an important topic in blockchain infrastructure controlling the scheme of how                         
various resources are labeled and referred to across the system. Logical entities that have a                             
distinct address include token accounts, smart contracts and their stored variables. 

Different blockchain implementations have adopted different addressing schemes. We believe                   
that no single scheme is superior over all others, furthermore, different addressing schemes                         
have different qualities and are suitable for different applications. For example, some                       
addressing schemes, such as Schnorr public key based, enable native support for multiple                         
signatures. Other addressing schemes have wider ecosystem presence and are supported by                       
more hardware devices and HSMs. Moreover, an addressing scheme that is compatible with                         
the one used by another blockchain implementation will allow end users the convenience of                           
using the same public address across multiple platforms. 

In order to promote interoperability between blockchain implementations and allow for easier                       
migration onto the platform, Orbs supports a universal signature and addressing scheme. This                         
method allows applications and users to use a range of popular addressing schemes side by                             
side by specifying the type of address next to the address itself. From an architecture                             
perspective, addressing schemes are managed by a dedicated module which can be                       
upgraded to support additional future schemes as they become popular across the industry. 

Network Owned Secrets 
In centralized systems, secure operations are commonly based on secrets owned by the                         
governing service which can be used to sign, encrypt or decrypt data. As decentralized                           
networks are comprised of independent nodes in a trustless setting, applying a similar method                           
is not as straightforward. Secrets can only be held by individual nodes. The network as a                               
whole is usually unable to hold a shared secret and use it for secure operations, as due to the                                     
open and decentralized nature of the system, this secret will easily leak. 

36 



This limitation often causes blockchain implementations to rely on trust for scenarios where                         
trust should not have normally been required. A good example is how the client of an end user                                   
communicates with the network and performs queries on its state, such as checking the                           
user’s balance. Assuming the client cannot run a full node that synchronizes with the network                             
and performs the complete suite of resource intensive validations, some compromises must                       
be made. A common workaround is for the client to communicate with the network through a                               
specific gateway node and delegate some of the validations to it. This would mean a client                               
query for network state needs to trust the gateway node to provide an honest response. Some                               
improvements over this approach include redundancy tactics of querying multiple gateway                     
nodes at once, choosing the gateway node randomly, fraud-proofs , etc. 43

Network owned secrets is a cryptographic protocol introduced by the Orbs platform, that                         
provides the ability to hold a shared secret securely in a decentralized network. None of the                               
consensus nodes have direct knowledge of this secret, and only a combined effort of a                             
specified majority among them can facilitate this secret to perform a secure operation like                           
signing, encrypting or decrypting data. The mechanism relies on a cryptographic primitive                       
called ​threshold encryption and described in detail in the technical white paper of ​Helix                           
Consensus Algorithm​. The benefit of this method is that the combined signature is only                           
produced after reaching a threshold amount of signatures by individual nodes, each using                         
their own individual secret that no other node knows. Thus, we have created a combined                             
signature that can effectively be considered as the signature of the entire network. When the                             
network as a whole has the parallel of a private and public key, many useful secure operations                                 
become easy to implement. 

Network owned secrets provide the ability for secure interaction with the network without the                           
need to trust specific nodes. Consider a client that desires to perform a smart contract                             
calculation and is unable to run a full node. Instead of querying one of the network nodes as a                                     
gateway and trusting its response, by using a network secret to sign the combined response                             
of multiple nodes, the client can verify the response simply by checking the signature. 

Another interesting capability gained from the network’s ability to own secrets is holding                         
assets or accounts on the network level. Consider the requirement to implement a smart                           
contract over the platform that controls an account on a different blockchain like Ethereum.                           
Normally, this requirement would not have been possible to implement because smart                       
contracts cannot hold secrets. Using a network owned secret, though, a private key can be                             
generated by the collective for nodes after consensus. This private key is unknown to any of                               
the individual nodes and can be used to access an external Ethereum wallet securely.                           
Moreover, smart contracts can be used to provide key services such as key management,                           
DRM, etc. 

43 ​https://gist.github.com/justusranvier/451616fa4697b5f25f60 

37 

https://gist.github.com/justusranvier/451616fa4697b5f25f60


Orbs Architecture 
The detailed architecture of the Orbs platform will be outlined in a set of technical architecture                               
white papers. In general, the Orbs architecture consists of multiple layers, responsible for                         
different functions in the system. The layers and services are built such that they can operate                               
on different machines and scale independently as needed. As a design goal, the architecture                           
attempts to separate services and modules as much as possible within a layer in order to                               
enable flexibility, upgradability and interoperability. 

A key component in the architecture is the support of virtual blockchains - multiple parallel                             
instances of the consensus, state and storage layers; that provide the illusion of a separate                             
dedicated blockchain over a shared physical node environment. The concept of blockchain                       
virtualization is discussed in greater detail in the following sections. 

Infrastructure Layers and Services 

Client SDK - ​A client-side library for mobile and web apps that connects end users to the                               
network. The SDK can sign and encrypt requests and verify responses without relying on                           
trusted nodes. 

38 



 

Public API - A microservice that exposes all public web API to clients (such as REST or                                 
JSON-RPC). Provides the endpoint handling all end user transactions and queries. 

Gossip - A microservice that provides efficient one-to-many and one-to-one communication                     
between nodes in the network. The novel communication scheme of the Orbs platform is                           
discussed in detail in the Helix white paper. 

Crypto Services - A library and service providing the low-level cryptographic routines and                         
services like signatures, hashes and encryption. Has both native and non-native fallbacks. 

Secure Storage - A library and service that store secrets like private keys in a secure manner.                                 
Uses HSM  when available, relying on dedicated hardware and tamper-resistant enclosures. 44

System Parameters and Governance - Holds infrastructure configuration parameters and                   
handles updates and provisioning. 

Virtual Machine (Compute) - A microservice that owns the execution of transactions and                         
smart contracts, serving all virtual chains. The compute layer holds transient state for                         
non-final execution and cross-chain data. 

Processors - A set of microservices providing the actual runtime environments needed for the                           
execution of smart contracts in various languages (EVM, Python, Java, JavaScript, etc). 

Raw Storage​ - A layer responsible for storing and retrieving raw data on local machines.  

Cross-chain Connector(s) - A set of microservices providing cross-chain interoperability with                     
third party blockchains like Ethereum. Provides access under consensus of the third party. 

Clock Sync ​- A microservice responsible for synchronizing clocks between different machines,                       
nodes and services. Provides a consistent frame of reference for absolute time. Global clock                           
synchronization is not a requirement for the ​Helix Consensus Algorithm but other system                         
services may benefit from this ability. 

Consensus - A microservice instantiated per virtual chain that is responsible for achieving                         
agreement among nodes on the order of transactions and their validity. Implements the                         
consensus algorithm. Consists of the sub-layers: Ordering, Validation, Transaction Pool. 

State Storage - A microservice instantiated per virtual chain that holds the mutable and                           
immutable state that is under consensus. Manages efficient caching, sharding and                     
redundancy for the state data. Accessed by the Virtual Machine and Public API. 

Block Storage - A microservice instantiated per virtual chain that holds the incremental                         
long-term journal of all previous closed blocks. Manages efficient sharding and redundancy                       
for the blocks’ data. Used to generate and validate the state. 

44 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hardware_security_module 

39 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hardware_security_module


Virtual Chain Parameters and Governance - Instantiated per virtual chain and holds the virtual                           
chain specific configuration parameters and handles updates and provisioning. 

Resources Pools vs. Virtual Chains 

The Orbs architecture is comprised of a set of microservices providing different types of                           
resources to the network. Each type of resource can be scaled separately according to the                             
actual requirements of the network. A service like Public API can be scaled aggressively by                             
launching multiple instances as more concurrent end users connect to the network, compared                         
to the Consensus service that is instantiated per node based on the number of virtual chains.  

Different applications running on top of the Orbs platform may have different requirements for                           
different resources. For example, a compute intensive application may require a large capacity                         
of decentralized compute resources while a database application may require a large capacity                         
of decentralized storage. Moreover, the amount of resources is expected to change over time                           
with the introduction of new applications and the evolution of their needs. 

40 



In order to efficiently utilize the resources and microservices available on each node, they are                             
regarded as a shared pool of resources that is then allocated to different virtual chains based                               
on their SLA requirements. Some resources may be dedicated to a virtual chain whereas                           
others are allocated dynamically based on demand. An architecture based on resource pools                         
effectively utilizes the varying capabilities of heterogeneous nodes and supports an elastic                       
resource capacity. Each node is paid for the sum of the services it provided to the network,                                 
and penalized if it failed to deliver on its commitments. This gives node operators the                             
incentives to add resources as needed, and to maintain the committed quality of service. 

41 



Consensus 

Pragmatic Decentralization and Trust 
Consensus is one of the core subsystems required for a blockchain infrastructure and the                           
choice of consensus model is without a doubt one of the first decisions we have to make. The                                   
question of consensus, above any other, is riddled with preconceived notions and strong                         
opinion. Debates between the camps of Proof of Work (PoW) and Proof of Stake (PoS) often                               
borderline philosophy . Our position, as usual, will have to emerge from a careful analysis of                             45

our requirements. 

Consensus comes to solve the problem of agreement in a decentralized system, where the                           
selection between different possible agreements could create profits or losses to different                       
parties. In a centralized system, there are no different parties, thus no conflict in selecting an                               
agreement. Before diving into the discussion, we should examine how decentralized each part                         
of the network really is. 

Looking at the ​network entities diagram, let’s begin with end users, our first anchor.                           
Consumers, users of apps like instant messengers, are generally unaware of the benefits of                           
decentralization, unlike the early adopters of Bitcoin. In the near future, it’s also safe to say                               
that the vast majority of consumers will not grasp the difference between a decentralized                           
system and a centralized one. Contrary to the trustless ideal behind Bitcoin, end users will                             
never go over the source code of a product before compiling it themselves, nor will they verify                                 
the signature to make sure they’ve downloaded an authentic copy. Consumers, as always, will                           
place their trust in a brand. 

Brands are almost always centralized entities: they have one leadership and one policy. They                           
usually rely on centralized delivery channels to reach consumers, like the Apple or Google app                             
stores and websites with branded domain names managed centrally and hosted on                       
centrally-managed servers. Consider a consumer typing in their secret passphrase into a                       
mobile app wallet. The consumer must trust that the developer of this mobile app isn’t                             
stealing their private key, abusing it or transmitting it outside. When interacting with                         

45 ​https://download.wpsoftware.net/bitcoin/old-pos.pdf 

42 

CONSENSUS

https://download.wpsoftware.net/bitcoin/old-pos.pdf


blockchain, it will be code created and signed by brands that will ultimately interface, on behalf                               
of their users, with decentralized apps. 

This observation fundamentally changes how we evaluate open consensus models: it means                       
that any user’s voting power is essentially delegated to the brand whose code they are using.                               
Even in models like Delegated Proof of Stake, the voting power in the delegate election is                               
implicitly delegated to the brand. 

Healthy Distribution of Power 
Before we discuss political power in a decentralized network, we need to be clear on what this                                 
power is useful for. In most decentralized networks, political power is used for two types of                               
decisions: real-time validation of transactions, and governance of the network itself (agreeing                       
on protocol upgrades, parameter changes, forks to the blockchain, etc). 

Real-time Validation Rights 

The effect of political power in real time validation is limited when the protocol is well-defined,                               
because the fundamental rules are axiomatic to the operation of the network. For example, a                             
decentralized ledger would not enable any verifier - no matter how powerful - to approve                             
transactions that are not signed by the payer. If it did so, it violated the rules of the protocol, so                                       
the allegedly-approved transactions will either be ignored by the network, or the network will                           
halt because the consensus broke. It is clear that egalitarian distributions of power, which                           
make it harder to stage such attacks, leads to more robust and sustainable platforms. 

Manipulations that do not break the protocol are limited, then, to undetectable violations of the                             
protocol; for example, deliberately failing to propagate transactions, manipulating the order of                       
transactions within a block, selfish mining , and so on. To some extent, the ability to abuse                               46

power in this real-time validation can be further limited if the protocol is designed in a way that                                   
limits validators’ ability to apply such manipulations. 

Governance Decision Rights 

An efficient mechanism for agreeing on network governance issues is critical for its long-term                           
relevance. As an industry that relies on state-of-the-art technologies in cryptography,                     
distributed systems, network and software infrastructure, we can expect a steady current of                         
innovations that can further improve and extend the abilities of a given blockchain platform.                           
Furthermore, as blockchain solutions enter mainstream industries, new uses and new                     
contexts of use expect to be catered by these platforms. Adaptability is important for any                             

46 ​https://www.cs.cornell.edu/~ie53/publications/btcProcFC.pdf 

43 

https://www.cs.cornell.edu/~ie53/publications/btcProcFC.pdf


 

good blockchain platform, and the mechanics of network governance should not be a barrier                           
to it. 

Whereas most technological advancements are easily agreed upon, conflicts arise where                     
interests are not aligned. In order to analyze healthy power distribution patterns, we must first                             
understand what interests are in play, and who the actors are.  

With a bird’s eye view on blockchain governance, we can see three archetypes of                           
stakeholders: 

● End users 
● Decentralized app developers catering to end users 
● Network infrastructure operators (e.g. miners) 

As designers of a platform that aims to serve consumer applications, our approach is to try                               
and maximize the utility for users.  

It is easy to see that the interests of infrastructure operators (such as Bitcoin miners) are                               
normally misaligned with those of the end users. As a result, networks are slow to adopt                               
changes, even when those are urgently needed. A notable example of the damages of such                             
conflict is the 20-month debate in the Bitcoin community over the switch to SegWit (BIP141 )                             47

that was designed to resolve a technical issue in the protocol, but had several side-effects                             
expected to impact the revenues of miners. Ultimately, following months of great uncertainty                         
for users and app developers, the network forked on August 2017. 

Developers’ interest in infrastructure choices are usually well aligned with the end users’,                         
except for situations where a proposed change could be used by an incumbent to fend off                               
competition. App vendors may also be divided on their preferences between newer and                         
field-proven technologies. Vendors of mature and established apps tend to be risk-averse and                         
prefer waiting for technologies to ripen, whereas fledgling apps see value in adopting                         
avant-garde technologies that have greater potential to disrupt incumbents. ​Platform                   
virtualization has great potential in mitigating many of these conflicts, as it allows each                           
application to govern many aspects of its own infrastructure independently from others. 

As for the end users, we believe their vote is well-aligned to their utility, as long as they are well                                       
informed as to the practical implications of their decisions. However, involving end users in                           
governance decisions is extremely hard in decentralized systems: user identities are usually                       
not connected to real-world identities, and digital identities can be easily forged. This issue is                             
usually mitigated by weighting user votes with their stake in the system’s currency, at the risk                               
of concentrating power in the hands of a few rich users. 

47 ​https://github.com/bitcoin/bips/blob/master/bip-0141.mediawiki 

44 

https://github.com/bitcoin/bips/blob/master/bip-0141.mediawiki


Proof of Work 
If most people are honest, a majority vote on the integrity of a public ledger is a                                 
straightforward consensus that is decentralized, permissionless and open. But majorities are                     
an elusive concept when relying on digital identities, as the cost of generating new identities is                               
negligible (Sybil Attack ). An ingenious solution to this problem is PoW, proposed by Dwork                           48

and Naor in 1992 , in which suffrage is subject to spending computer resources and energy                             49

on solving a cryptographic puzzle. PoW is widely used today in permissionless distributed                         
ledgers. 

Commonly, a PoW ledger arrives at consensus over time: anyone can be the public verifier for                               
a set of transactions (usually, a “block”), if they are first to solve a PoW puzzle; their efforts on                                     
the puzzle will be compensated by a cryptocurrency reward. Consensus on the validity of a                             
block builds gradually, as future blocks refer to our block as their predecessor. A perpetrator                             
will be at loss for trying to publicly validate an invalid block, because his expenditure on the                                 
PoW will not be reimbursed if his (invalid) block is not referred to by future blocks. 

Although PoW ledgers achieve the utopian ideal of a decentralized, permissionless and open                         
consensus, their application is far from creating utopia. For PoW to be adequately secure, the                             
cost of solving the puzzles must be proportional to the value of the underlying assets; the                               
global impact of this on mass-market ledgers is frightening. To illustrate, as of January 2018,                             
Bitcoin mining is estimated to be taking nearly 1/5000 of the world electricity consumption .                           50

As cryptocurrencies reach mass market audiences and significantly grow in value and                       
transaction volumes, we expect that PoW ledgers will become unsustainable due the amount                         
of emissions involved with their operation. Naturally, these costs are imposed on the users of                             
the Infrastructure as fees and inflation; costs of using PoW networks are higher than those of                               
the alternatives. In order to reach the massive scale required for consumer apps, lowering                           
infrastructure costs is also a core requirement of the Orbs platform. 

In the near-term, PoW poses several immediate and practical challenges to mass-market                       
adoption. One is with the governance of such networks; in addition to the inherent                           
complexities of governing a decentralized movement, a side effect of the proliferation of PoW                           
is that mining has become a business of specialists, adding another powerful, heavily invested                           
stakeholder in the system whose interests aren’t aligned with those of users or app vendors                             
(as discussed above). Developers of consumer apps are the political group which the Orbs                           
platform is optimized for, as their involvement in the network is paramount to its purpose, yet                               
nobody expects companies like Kik to become competitive PoW miners. 

Another critical barrier to using PoW in mass-market applications is the inherent latency                         
associated with eventual consensus. The acceptance of a block is determined by the depth or                             

48 ​https://www.microsoft.com/en-us/research/wp-content/uploads/2002/01/IPTPS2002.pdf 
49 ​http://www.wisdom.weizmann.ac.il/~naor/PAPERS/pvp.ps 
50 ​https://digiconomist.net/bitcoin-energy-consumption 

45 

https://www.microsoft.com/en-us/research/wp-content/uploads/2002/01/IPTPS2002.pdf
http://www.wisdom.weizmann.ac.il/~naor/PAPERS/pvp.ps
https://digiconomist.net/bitcoin-energy-consumption


weight of other blocks referring to that block; this weight accumulates slowly as blocks cannot                             
be created too fast without raising the probability of conflicts, which in blockchain systems                           
come as forks to the chain. Newer protocols can significantly reduce this latency by using                             
data structures that embrace forks as a valid state of the blocks’ formation. Significant work                             
has been done in this field by Sompolinsky, Lewenberg and Zohar, including the design and                             
validation of the SPECTRE protocol that implements a block-DAG (Directed Acyclic Graph) to                         51

replace the conventional block-chain. Such work shows a lot of promise in advancing PoW                           
decentralized payment ledgers beyond their current limitations, but at the moment do not                         
offer a good solution for more abstract systems such as smart contracts, as their use entails                               
very high complexity of calculating the system state. 

The Orbs research group has invested significant efforts based on the original SPECTRE                         
research and had discussions with Prof. Zohar in attempt to develop a practical production                           
implementation of the protocol. Ultimately, due to the difficulty in attaining the finality required                           
for the efficient execution of smart contracts in DAG-based systems, and inherent limitations                         
of PoW in general, we have decided to move away from the SPECTRE research as the base for                                   
the Orbs platform consensus strategy. We remain supportive of this promising concept and                         
watchful as its research matures with advances like PHANTOM . 52

Proof of Stake 
An alternative means for countering Sybil attacks is to tie suffrage to ownership of a digital                               
asset, usually a cryptocurrency. On the face of it, PoS provides an elegant alternative to PoW,                               
without the costs and energy waste associated with it. But the fact that PoS schemes don’t                               
require verifiers to risk any exoteric resources requires dealing with a whole new set of                             
challenges. 

One major challenge is that participation in the validation process is not a direct concern of                               
most users of the platform. Someone using a blockchain for transferring value, or a user of an                                 
application that makes use of smart contracts, would usually not be aware of the mechanics                             
of the decentralized ledger, and is likely to have little motivation to participate in the process.                               
This is especially problematic for real-time validation of transactions, in which the validator is                           
required to be constantly online and to allocate network and processing resources to a                           
nonstop feed of transactions.  

Some platforms try to replicate the ecosystem of specialist miners that are commonplace in                           
PoW systems. This includes a wide variety of models, ranging from purely permissionless                         
models in which would-be verifiers need to stake or burn tokens as a form of earnestness, to                                 
semi-permissioned models such as delegation, where stake-owners trust their voting rights to                       
a specialist. Though the models greatly differ, all face the same fundamental challenges of a                             

51 ​https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/1159.pdf 
52 ​https://eprint.iacr.org/2018/104.pdf 

46 

https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/1159.pdf
https://eprint.iacr.org/2018/104.pdf


lack of incentives for validators to act honestly and an increased risk of formation of a                               
dishonest majority. 

There are attempts at creating a full-participation, direct voting PoS systems. One notable                         
example is AlgoRand by Chen and Micali, which very cleverly weighs a random sortition by                             53

user stake, thus requiring only a small sample of users to participate in validation at any given                                 
moment as some kind of jury duty. We have high hopes for such models, but it is important to                                     
note that at the moment there are significant practical barriers to their implementation in                           
mainstream applications. Mass-market users cannot be expected to be active in the technical                         
process of transaction validation, nor to verify the software they are using for such validation;                             
they merely download an app from an app-store. In practice, this gives the app developers                             
total control over a user’s voting power, making the system just as good as a delegated PoS                                 
system with all its disadvantages. We hope that newer advances in cryptography, such as                           
proof bearing code and other innovations, can make these systems practical for mainstream                         
applications.  

Permissioned Models 
The idealistic nature of the blockchain community has traditionally pulled towards consensus                       
designs that are decentralized, permissionless, open and transparent. By relaxing the                     
constraint on being permissionless, Sybil attacks are no longer a concern, and faster, more                           
efficient consensus algorithms can be used. Furthermore, permissioned validation also entails                     
that the identity of the validators is known to all. Not hiding behind the veil of anonymity,                                 
validators may be required to make public commitments to abide by the rules of the protocol;                               
in such case even the rules that cannot be enforced using technical measures, may be                             
enforceable in commercial lawsuits. 

There are two forms for setting up a public permissioned network in decentralized context.                           
The first, a ​consortium​, in which a central body governs the network thus distributing the                             
validation permissions. Real-time validation permissions may still be considered                 
decentralized, although the question of whether the governing body carries liability for                       
operating the network remains. The second, a ​federation​, leaves the governance decentralized:                       
permissions are not common to the network but are rather specified by each user or app                               
developer. Different users may be seeing different projections of the ledger, when they don’t                           
share the same set of permissioned validators. In some architectures, this adds significant                         
complexity to the consensus protocol and ledger structures, however it remains very simple in                           
platforms that provide blockchain virtualization. 

Federated models for public blockchains are well-established in the industry with projects like                         
Ripple and Stellar steadily gaining ground. These projects maintain a high degree of                         54 55

53 ​https://arxiv.org/pdf/1607.01341.pdf 
54 ​https://ripple.com/ 
55 ​https://www.stellar.org/ 

47 

https://arxiv.org/pdf/1607.01341.pdf
https://ripple.com/
https://www.stellar.org/


decentralization, openness and transparency, where any party can set up a node and verify the                             
history for transaction integrity. The permissioned aspect of the model comes into play in the                             
validation of new transactions being written onto the chain. Every node can specify the list of                               
nodes it trusts to participate in the validation of its transactions, thus creating a combination                             
of groups with differing consensus quorums. 

A Layered Approach 
How should we choose a consensus strategy best suited for the use case of large scale                               
consumer apps? The first question to ask is how should political power be distributed in the                               
network. Consumer apps are already a primary and certain stakeholder as they drive traffic to                             
the network and bring their user base. We established that consumers trust consumer brands                           
through which they make transactions in decentralized apps. Is adding additional                     
stakeholders as validators in a permissionless way beneficial for consumers? 

We believe that today, federated blockchains offer the best solution for mass market                         
consumer applications, both in performance and in alignment with the interests of the                         
consumers. We do not expect consumers to be directly involved in governance of the                           
blockchain anytime soon; any practical system that wishes to align with the long-term interest                           
of the consumer can either empower app developers or interested 3rd parties such as miners.                             
App developers are already the trusted, dominant stakeholder in the app market, entrusting                         
them to this power maximizes the benefit for the consumer. Distribution of power between                           
developers should be such that limits the individual power held by each one separately. All                             
these requirements are best met by federated consensus models. 

Are federated models open enough? We can try to answer this question in several ways. From                               
the practical perspective, the answer is clearly “yes,” it puts the trust in parties that have a                                 
clear stake in the success of the platform and that proved to collaborate well in most                               
scenarios (with the exception of blocking competition). From a strategic perspective, it is                         
unclear whether these models are stable over time, especially in comparison to PoW models                           
which are considered very robust. From the legal and regulatory perspective, there is no ruling                             
currently on the subject, either for or against. Our analysis (see ​Decentralized Ledger Security​)                           
and the de-facto prominence of federation models among today’s leading blockchain                     
platforms provide some indication that these models are seen as sufficiently decentralized. 

As the market matures, new insights or new regulatory approaches could tip the scales                           
against federated governance. In such circumstance, we anticipate that the governance of the                         
federation itself (accepting and rejecting of federation memberships; changes to federation                     
members’ permissions; changes to the federation rules) will transition to a permissionless                       
model such as delegated PoS, similar in principle to the governing model of EOS or TON .                               56 57

56 ​https://eos.io/ 
57 ​https://techcrunch.com/2018/01/08/telegram-open-network/ 

48 

https://eos.io/
https://techcrunch.com/2018/01/08/telegram-open-network/


This structure preserves most advantages of the pure federated model, but remains our                         
second choice because it lacks the simplicity and elegance of the federated model. 

Helix Consensus Algorithm 
As blockchain technology reaches mass-market apps, we realize that classic forms of                       
decentralized consensus are simply inapplicable. The volumes of transactions in a                     
mass-market setting would cause PoW consensus to be too expensive, too slow and cause                           
too much environmental damage. The fact that the apps themselves, rather than the                         
mass-market users, are in control of the users’ voting power make PoS too risky of a choice                                 
for such a platform. Moreover, the typical pattern of app popularity is that of extreme                             
inequality: at any given time and for almost any segment, a handful of popular apps overpower                               
the infinitely long tail of less-popular apps. Because we think the ideal power distribution                           
should be one that avoids significant inequalities in power, we prefer to create a system that                               
assures an upper limit to any one stakeholder’s power. 

With the birth of the Orbs platform, we will be introducing Helix, a decentralized, open and                               
transparent consensus algorithm tailored to the ideals of mass-market apps. Our fundamental                       
assumption is that app vendors hold most of the power in a platform that caters to apps, and                                   
that a consensus protocol must be designed from ground up to ensure that vendors’ interests                             
are aligned with each other and with the interests of their users. For network governance, this                               
means the protocol has to work natively with chain virtualization, as it allows the governance                             
of each app to be separate from that of other apps. Beyond that, voting power is distributed                                 
between known verifiers that are members of a federation, thus limiting the power held by a                               
single voter. For real-time validation, we require the protocol to be fast, immediately-final and                           
for it to be impractical for validators to manipulate the selection and ordering of transactions. 

The full details of the algorithm are published in a separate peer-reviewed technical white                           
paper. The primary requirements that dictated the design of the algorithm include: 

Finality of Consensus Results 

The Helix consensus algorithm provides immediate transaction finality. In business                   
applications, transaction finality is a highly desirable property - enabling stakeholders to                       
provide intended services immediately once the transaction is executed. Unlike the                     
probabilistic finality of transactions in systems like Bitcoin, stakeholders are not required to                         
wait for multiple blocks in order to gain sufficient confidence that a transaction will not be                               
reversed. 

The finality property also enables efficient usage of the state database. The state database                           
can be updated under consensus at the closure of each block and its authenticity can be                               
easily validated by its root hash. Keeping a state database that is always under consensus                             

49 



 

prevents the need for high bandwidth access to a large transaction journal and the need for                               
additional checkpoint mechanisms. 

Ordering of Opaque Transactions 

An important property of consensus algorithms that rarely gets the attention it deserves is                           
fairness. Many algorithms rely on full-nodes or miners to decide the fair order in which new                               
transactions are inserted into blocks, without defining rules or method to enforce fairness.                         
Furthermore, some networks give miners the freedom to choose which transactions to                       
include in a block, thus creating preference for high-fee transactions and enabling censorship. 

The Helix consensus algorithm uses ordering of opaque transactions to ensure fairness and                         
censorship resistance. Transactions are encrypted by end-users before transmission and are                     
only decrypted after consensus on their ordering was reached. This mechanism guarantees                       
clients receive fair service without a need to trust nodes or to provide them with direct                               
incentives. 

Separation of Ordering From Validation 

Pending encrypted transactions are first ordered, and only once consensus on the ordering is                           
achieved, are the decrypted transactions executed, achieving consensus on their validation.                     
Separation of ordering from validation enables higher scalability and a higher transaction rate.                         
Moreover, it allows the system to optimize the properties for each stage, such as committee                             
size or the use of encrypted data. 

Fast Consensus by Committees 

The amount of communication in consensus protocols is highly dependent on the number of                           
nodes participating in the consensus. On one hand, we desire to increase the number of nodes                               
in order to increase the decentralization and security. On the other hand, we want to control                               
the amount of inter-node communication in order to reduce confirmation time and increase                         
throughput. Using randomly selected, unpredictable committees that take active part in the                       
creation of each block allows the system to increase the overall number of nodes while                             
maintaining an upper bound on communication overhead. 

Efficient Leader Election by Randomized Sort 

Many Byzantine Fault Tolerance algorithms, such as PBFT , are based on rotation of a                           58

primary or a leader node. In order to ensure liveness, these algorithms require mechanisms to                             
identify a faulty leader and act for its deposition. These mechanisms are typically complex,                           
rely on timeouts and result in a slow transition in cases where a new leader election is                                 

58 ​http://pmg.csail.mit.edu/papers/osdi99.pdf 

50 

http://pmg.csail.mit.edu/papers/osdi99.pdf


required. The transition overhead discourages frequent leader rotation resulting in imbalance                     
and suboptimal fairness. 

In order to efficiently and randomly elect different leaders for each consensus round, Helix                           
uses sortition for committee and leader election. For each block, the consensus nodes are                           
sorted based on a hash of the decrypted data of the previously ordered block, which provides                               
a random and consistent selection. Using the decryption that is only available after the                           
previous block has reached consensus prevents a leader from manipulating the block data in                           
order to control the next block committee members. The availability of a sorted list of the                               
committee members enables efficient fault tolerant communication protocols. These can                   
reduce the amount of network traffic and maximum propagation time, thus improving                       
transaction rate and scalability. 

Node Reputation System 

The consensus algorithm operates in a Byzantine environment, where some of the nodes may                           
be faulty or act maliciously. Moreover, not all the consensus nodes are homogeneous and                           
their performance or responsiveness may vary. In order to rapidly identify faulty nodes,                         
balance resources and incentivize nodes to behave according to the protocol, the Helix                         
algorithm maintains a decentralized reputation system where every node is scored by its                         
peers. Node reputation affects the political power of a node, such as its chance of being                               
included in committees. Reputation also assists in economic incentivization, such as payment                       
of fees to operators. For example, a node behaving in a manner discouraged by the protocol                               
will have its reputation score reduced accordingly and will be able to charge less for its                               
services. 

51 



Service Level Agreement (SLA) 

Industry Standard 
A Service Level Agreement (SLA) is a contract that describes the official commitment between                           
a service provider and a client. It describes the expected level of service, the metrics used to                                 
measure it and the penalties in case the agreed service level is not achieved. SLAs are widely                                 
used for services provided between organizations or even within an organization. It is an                           
industry standard in telecommunication, Internet providers, online services and also - cloud                       
Infrastructure as a Service (IaaS) providers such as AWS. 

A separate SLA is typically defined for each of the provided services. For example, in an IaaS                                 
platform, each of the core services (compute, storage, networking) would have their own SLA.                           
Users may have a choice between different SLAs, enabling different customers to plan                         
according to their needs. For example, an online consumer application may focus on                         
availability and consistent performance. Alternatively, offline applications may prioritize                 
average performance over consistency. 

An SLA protects both the customer and the service provider. It prevents misunderstandings                         
and misinterpretations by setting expectations explicitly. Moreover, an SLA helps customers                     
predict the level of received service in advance and budget accordingly. For service providers,                           
an SLA provides a means to estimate required resources and plan ahead. 

While SLAs are prevalent for applications running on centralized IaaS platforms, they are                         
lacking for decentralized ones. The inability to predict performance and costs reliably creates                         
a challenge for consumer brands to transition to decentralized businesses. 

CryptoKitties - a Case Study 
CryptoKitties is a social game operating on top of the Ethereum platform that allows players                             
to adopt, raise, breed and trade virtual cats. While the kitties themselves are cute and                             
delightful, the surge in popularity of the game and the amount of traffic it generated have                               
managed to bring the Ethereum network to severe congestion exceeding its capacity. 

52 

SERVICE LEVEL AGREEMENT (SLA)



CryptoKitties was launched at the end of November 2017 and immediately received high                         
interest from users, pouring game-related transactions to the Ethereum network. In the days                         
that followed the launch, game related transactions were almost 20% of the total transaction                           
volume on Ethereum. As a result, the amount of unprocessed transactions rose about six-fold                         

 and transaction fees climbed accordingly. 59

The resulting congestion on Ethereum has drawn attention from the crypto community and                         
the media. Many of the articles covering the phenomena raised questions about the general                           
scalability of blockchain technology . There’s no argument that highly scalable solutions are                       60

desired, but focusing on scale alone misses the main issue. 

Decentralized applications running on top of blockchain infrastructure cannot base                   
performance and fee estimations on whether or not a popular game will pop up. Popular apps                               
like CryptoKitties should not be viewed as a potential problem; popular applications showcase                         
the potential of blockchain technology and the impact it can have on everyday life. 

Kin by Kik interactive launched their Kin IPLv2 to production at the apex of the CryptoKitties                               
craze. As a result, their launch suffered from significant side-effects of the impact                         
CryptoKitties had on Ethereum . Their main conclusion was that SLAs are sorely needed.                         61

59 ​https://www.theatlas.com/charts/rkt8jKMZz 
60 ​http://www.bbc.com/news/technology-42237162 
61 ​https://medium.com/kinfoundation/insights-from-kin-initial-product-launch-441c458a4ece#479b 

53 

https://www.theatlas.com/charts/rkt8jKMZz
http://www.bbc.com/news/technology-42237162
https://medium.com/kinfoundation/insights-from-kin-initial-product-launch-441c458a4ece#479b


 

Consumer applications require an environment with predictable performance, transaction rate,                   
confirmation time and fee cost. A spike of 20% increase in traffic is difficult to handle by any                                   
infrastructure, centralized or not. However, an infrastructure solution that applies SLA rules                       
and isolation among applications would have had minor impact on existing applications and                         
would be more likely to contain this impact in agreed upon boundaries. For example, isolation                             
would assure a surge in CryptoKitties traffic would not cause congestions in other                         
applications. 

SLA in a Decentralized Context 
One challenge in providing an SLA in an open and decentralized platform is that platform                             
users don’t have direct agreements with infrastructure providers, so they don’t have a natural                           
counterparty with which to make such an agreement. 

Basic service on the Orbs platform is provided by shared resources, but as shared resources                             
get overloaded, the service level cannot be guaranteed. The platform introduces a service level                           
mechanism by allowing application developers using the platform to acquire dedicated                     
resources.  

By default, the Orbs platform can provide users interested in dedicated resources with a                           
minimal quality-of-service enforced by smart contract code. In case the service provided falls                         
below the requested service level, the user will be automatically compensated at the expense                           
of network nodes that did not contribute the processing performance expected from them. A                           
smart contact based scheme should be sufficient for most consumer applications, alleviating                       
the need for direct legally binding agreements between parties. 

Some users of the platform may require legally binding agreements, for example applications                         
that need to provide such SLA to their own users. If such requirement arises, the Orbs                               
platform could provide a mechanism in which application developers purchase dedicated                     
resources directly from operators of network nodes. By acquiring sufficient resources to                       
support the throughput required for the operation of their application, developers can                       
guarantee a minimal service level for their users, backed by a user agreement. This can be                               
conducted in a marketplace where app developers and node operators can trade directly.                         
Such external agreements can be facilitated by the protocol by indicating the usage                         
agreement on a transaction alongside the signature used to authorize it. 

Of course, acquisition of dedicated resources does not come in place of decentralization. The                           
acquired capacity will not be provided directly to the purchaser, but rather added to the shared                               
resource pool. So, in practice, acquiring the resources establishes an SLA between the node                           
operator and the shared pool back-to-back with an SLA between the shared pool and the                             
purchaser. In case the node operator fails to deliver the required capacity when the system is                               
under load, a compensation amount will automatically be deducted from their fees.                       

54 



 

Regardless, it is still possible that other providers on the shared pool have vacant resources                             
and the quality of service with the purchaser can be maintained. 

Predictable Fee Models 
As discussed in the CryptoKitties case study, one of the main challenges witnessed during the                             
launch of Kin by Kik Interactive on top of Ethereum is unpredictability of fees. Kin took it upon                                   
itself to subsidize infrastructure costs for Kik power users, in order to encourage end users to                               
adopt the token with minimal friction. The main problem, as it turned out, wasn’t that the fees                                 
were high, but that they were impossible to plan and budget for in advance. 

Budgeting is crucial for the success of consumer applications: product development is                       
expensive, and entrepreneurs or companies want to know in advance, that if their app                           
succeeds, they will get a return on their investment. To know that, they need to weigh in their                                   
operating costs. 

During the first few months of the Kin launch, Ethereum fees changed in a full order of                                 
magnitude. First, the USD price of Ether, notorious for being volatile, increased by 200% during                             
the launch period. Since fees are paid in Ether, this exchange rate fluctuation translated                           
directly to an increase in costs. Second, Ethereum fees are determined by market forces,                           
where transactions offering higher fees will be processed first. During the Kin launch, the                           
Ethereum network became congested, resulting in higher bids from users across the network.                         
To get its transactions across, the Kik app had to offer significantly higher fees. 

The Orbs platform is designed to provide a pricing and fee model that is predictable and can                                 
be calculated in advance. We believe that such certainty is a fundamental requirement from a                             
platform. The industry standard from centralized infrastructure solutions, such as AWS, is to                         
provide accurate pricing calculators . Prices of on-demand services and subscriptions are                     62

listed in ORBS tokens. 

The fact that services are listed in ORBS, a token with floating exchange rate, creates risks for                                 
both service sellers and buyers. In case of exchange-rate fluctuations, ORBS tokens may                         
increase in value, effectively raising the infrastructure costs to Orbs platform users, or                         
decrease in value, possibly making the operation of a validating node non-economical.                       
Additionally, operation expenditures are exposed to price fluctuations of the underlying IT                       
infrastructure (storage, processing, network access etc), but their prices have tended to                       
decline gradually over time. As for exchange-rate fluctuations, we expect them to be                         
slow-paced. Economic models predict that high rate of economic activity in a cryptocurrency                         
attenuates exchange rate fluctuations , this should be the case with ORBS tokens, thanks to                           63

the amount of activity expected from the launch partners.  

62 ​https://calculator.s3.amazonaws.com/index.html 
63 ​https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2842557 

55 

https://calculator.s3.amazonaws.com/index.html
https://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm?abstract_id=2842557


To accommodate potential price fluctuations and provide service cost stability to users,                       
on-demand service prices will be normalized periodically to match changes in IT service costs.                           
This is done by pegging the on-demand tariffs to an index of storage and compute unit prices,                                 
as published by major third party cloud service providers such as AWS. In the future, it may be                                   
possible to replace the cloud services index with an index of dedicated capacity prices, as                             
these are determined by supply and demand in free market settings. Such a solution would be                               
more sustainable over time than a cloud services index, because it is directly linked to de-facto                               
costs of node operators, but its implementation requires some experience in terms of how the                             
marketplace for dedicated capacity behaves. 

Dedicated, Reserved and On-Demand Resources 
One of the challenges in dynamic resource management is the inherent trade-off between the                           
ability to share resources and the ability to guarantee their availability. In general, we                           
differentiate between three main schemes of resource allocation: 

Dedicated resources - A physical resource is dedicated to the application, providing maximum                         
isolation, high predictability and visibility. Dedicated resources are guaranteed to always be                       
available for the customer. These resources must be paid for, even when unused, making this                             
scheme of allocation the most expensive of the three. 

Reserved resources - An amount of resources is provisioned in advanced. Reserved resources                         
may be guaranteed under some restrictions or prioritized over on-demand resources. As                       
reserved resources are provisioned in advance and allow the service provider to plan better,                           
they are typically provided with a significant discount over on-demand resources. 

On-demand resources - Resources are shared between applications and are allocated                     
on-the-fly based on availability. Payment is normally based on actual usage. On-demand                       
resources are recommended for low cost applications or for application with unpredictable                       
workloads. 

A common strategy for an application looking to optimize is to allocate a mix of resources.                               
For example, an application may allocate dedicated resources to guarantee the minimum                       
performance required for basic operation, reserved resources to meet a typical workload and                         
on-demand resources to accommodate peak usage. 

Virtual Chains and Blockchain Virtualization 
Blockchain virtualization implemented over the Orbs platform provides the illusion of a                       
dedicated blockchain while running on top of a shared physical node infrastructure, thus                         
enjoying the same security and decentralization provided by the shared environment.                     
Virtualization separates the resources available to applications from the underlying physical                     
ones. The properties of blockchain virtualization include isolation, quality of service, SLA,                       

56 



control, governance and elastic resource capacity. The majority of blockchain                   
implementations today, like Ethereum, are shared, where multiple decentralized applications                   
run side by side without isolation, suffering from unpredictable performance. Blockchain                     
virtualization allows us to overcome these limitations without compromising on the risks of a                           
centralized or private infrastructure. 

Almost two decades ago, the industry started to shift towards server virtualization. Today,                         
almost every consumer application runs on virtual machines. A similar shift started a decade                           
ago in networking, where virtualization enabled large networks with flexible topologies to run                         
as virtual networks over an underlying shared infrastructure, providing the look and feel of a                             
dedicated private network. We expect the same industry shift to take place in the field of                               
blockchain. 

The term “virtualization” broadly describes a layer of abstraction that provides separation of a                           
logical resource from the underlying physical delivery of its function. With blockchain                       
virtualization, each component of the blockchain infrastructure, such as the consensus, the                       
state and block storage, and the virtual machine (compute) layer are virtualized. This allows                           
virtual consensus instances to be allocated with a desired transaction confirmation rate that                         
can differ across virtual chains. Moreover, different virtual consensus instances can operate                       
concurrently, scale gracefully and provide better utilization of resources. Unlike private                     
blockchains, virtual consensus instances enjoy the security, resilience, decentralization and                   
compliance benefits of the underlying shared infrastructure. 

Dedicated physical infrastructure - First generation (Bitcoin). Each application runs over                     
dedicated infrastructure and has its own separate blockchain. 

57 



 

Shared infrastructure - ​Second generation (Ethereum). Multiple applications run on top of                       
shared infrastructure. The consensus, storage and compute services are shared across                     
applications without isolation or SLA commitments. 

Blockchain virtualization - ​Third generation (Orbs). Each dominant application runs on a                       
separate virtual blockchain, relying on virtual instances of the consensus, storage and                       
compute services, but sharing the same physical infrastructure. 

Design Principles 

Blockchain virtualization addresses some of the challenges that decentralized applications are                     
facing and provides properties that resemble the familiar operation over centralized IaaS or                         
cloud platforms. The full architecture details are published in a separate technical white paper.                           
The design principles of the solution include: 

Service Level Agreement (SLA) - Each virtual chain may guarantee a service level to meet its                               
needs. Adhering to an SLA is a commitment to reduce the performance impact of other                             
applications that share the same physical infrastructure. 

Isolation - The separation of block storage and state of each virtual chain creates isolation                             
from faults and errors that occur on other chains. For example, a bug in an application’s smart                                 
contract may lead the virtual chain to fork but will not impact other virtual chains on the                                 
network. 

Sharding and scalability - Virtualization enables inherent sharding of the consensus, and a                         
first level of sharding for compute services and state storage. As there is no synchronization                             
dependency among different virtual chains, their consensus and storage can be handled                       
separately and run concurrently. 

Governance - While some configuration parameters have to align across all virtual chains,                         
many can be controlled independently. This allows every virtual chain to optimize and cater to                             
its application’s needs and reduces governance conflicts between stakeholders. 

Elastic capacity - Separation between physical and virtual resources allows a virtual chain to                           
add resources on demand in order to meet evolving usage patterns. Moreover, elastic                         
capacity allows temporary allocation of resources during unexpected bursts. 

Security and decentralization - While virtual chains can be dedicated to a single application,                           
the multitude of physical nodes operated by independent organizations and applications are                       
used in practice to process its consensus, capitalizing on the security in decentralization. 

Cross virtual chain smart contracts - While isolation is important for transactions within an                           
application or virtual chain, simple cross-chain interoperability proves useful. This requires                     
synchronization of all involved chains. Such operations are slower and require more resources                         
than a standard operation.   

58 



Consumer Scale 

Throughput and Latency 
The first challenge when designing a blockchain infrastructure for consumer scale is meeting                         
consumer expectations regarding throughput and latency. Successful consumer products                 
have the potential to reach millions of end users performing billions of interactions. This                           
massive scale regularly pushes traditional centralized infrastructure to its limit, making the                       
challenge for consensus-based decentralized infrastructure that much greater. 

Throughput is defined as the number of messages per second the network can                         
accommodate. In the field of blockchain, the number often taken into account is the number                             
of ​transactions per second that the network can confirm. Traditional blockchain                     
implementations, such as the current production version of Ethereum, can confirm about a                         
dozen transactions per second . The gap is significant, but this isn’t surprising since                         64

decentralization comes at a price. For example, transactions over blockchain are notoriously                       
difficult to parallelize, because the result of one transaction may depend on another.                         
Performing transactions synchronously adds a significant constraint and makes the                   
implementation much harder to scale out. Moreover, contrary to centralized systems, the                       
consensus process involves a number of independent nodes that must reach agreement over                         
every transaction. This process incurs significant overhead that centralized systems are not                       
required to deal with. 

Latency is defined as the amount of time it takes to process a single message over the                                 
network. In the field of blockchain, the number often perceived by users is ​confirmation time​.                             
If, for instance, Netflix was a consumer product on the blockchain, then a request to stream a                                 
video must be confirmed immediately so that the user would not have to wait to start enjoying                                 
the video. Traditional blockchain implementations, such as the current production version of                       
Ethereum, take dozens of seconds to confirm a transaction . This number often grows to                           65

minutes or even hours when the network becomes congested. The gap here is not surprising                             
as well. First, performing transactions synchronously means a transaction must wait in line                         

64 ​https://blog.ethereum.org/2018/01/02/q4-roundup/ 
65 ​https://etherscan.io/chart/blocktime 

59 

CONSUMER SCALE

https://blog.ethereum.org/2018/01/02/q4-roundup/
https://etherscan.io/chart/blocktime


and will only be processed once every previous transaction has been processed. Second, the                           
consensus process between a group of independent nodes usually requires several roundtrips                       
and is constrained by propagation time of the network which increases as more nodes                           
participate. Third, long block intervals are essential for security in some consensus algorithms.                         
In models that rely on eventual consensus, actual confirmation is only reached when an                           
arbitrary number of subsequent blocks are generated. 

Failure to meet consumer expectations in both of these regards threatens the very success of                             
the product. Consumers are notorious for having low tolerance for bad user experience. Their                           
expectations are determined by the experience they are used to getting from current,                         
centralized applications. It is reasonable to expect that most consumers will not be aware of                             
whether the application they use is decentralized or not. 

Scalable Fee Models 
Scalability of a system goes beyond raw network parameters like throughput and latency.                         
According to Kin by Kik Interactive, the main barrier to scale when launching on Ethereum was                               
infrastructure fees . The CAC (Customer Acquisition Cost) rose above $10 in transaction fees                         66

alone . It is quite clear that a successful consumer app cannot flourish in this environment.                             67

Reaching ten million users would cost over $100 million - beyond the total funding of the                               
project. 

An obvious solution is to reduce infrastructure fees dramatically. The high costs of Ethereum                           
are closely linked to its reliance on PoW consensus; in PoW, the operation costs grow                             
proportionally to the total value of assets on the network. In case the value grows, the process                                 
becomes more wasteful to maintain the proportion. In addition, the number of nodes in the                             
Ethereum network that validate every transaction is more than 20,000 , orders of magnitude                         68

more than reasonably required in a distributed system. Both of these cost factors can be                             
eliminated by moving away from PoW and using committees to reduce the number of                           
participants in consensus.  

There’s more to fee scalability than reducing absolute amounts. Network usage peaks may                         
cause fees to spiral out of control. In general, although market pricing is seemingly the most                               
efficient for determining fees, it is problematic when markets are too volatile. For instance, it                             
may cause entire apps to experience outages. Consider two popular consumer apps with                         
millions of users running side by side when demand exceeds the network capacity. Once the                             
first app modifies its client and increases the transaction fee bid over the other, at one instant                                 
its millions of users will have precedence over those of the other app, causing an                             
overwhelming outage for that app. 

66 ​https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5#2340 
67 ​https://medium.com/kinfoundation/insights-from-kin-initial-product-launch-441c458a4ece 
68 ​https://www.ethernodes.org/network/1 

60 

https://medium.com/kin-contributors/kins-blockchain-considerations-ebd0b60aebd5#2340
https://medium.com/kinfoundation/insights-from-kin-initial-product-launch-441c458a4ece
https://www.ethernodes.org/network/1


 

 

In Orbs, app developers can purchase reserved capacity in advance, protecting themselves                       
from price fluctuations; they can procure dedicated resources, isolating themselves from                     
peaks in demand; and they can use monthly subscriptions, reducing the overall exposure to                           
price volatility. 

Another fee-related decision that takes a significant toll over scalability is charging fees per                           
transaction - the common approach taken by general-purpose blockchains such as Ethereum.                       
This imposes a large overhead on the network operation. Processing of each transaction                         
requires writing to the native token’s ledger, making transactions harder to shard (since even                           
unrelated contracts need to be synchronized). In addition, per-transaction billing adds an                       
overhead in processing and storage, when compared with bulk subscriptions. 

A different fee model that is used to reduce per transaction costs in the industry is minimum                                 
balance per wallet. This model is used for example in blockchain platforms like Stellar. The                             
system is designed to provide the necessary friction to reduce spam and fake transaction                           
abuse. Once a user has proven to the platform that their wallet is indeed “real”, by placing a                                   
certain amount of tokens in this wallet in this case, the platform lifts usage limitations and                               
allows the user to place a large number of transactions from this wallet for a negligible fee. 

The problem with this approach is that consumers are not likely to commit up front for a                                 
service that they’re not sure about. Expecting end users to pay the minimum balance fee will                               
probably drop conversion below a level that consumer products can accept. What happens                         
usually, is that consumer-facing digital services, the providers of the decentralized apps,                       
attempt to subsidize these fees to attract customers. Once these fees are subsidized by a 3rd                               
party, they lose their edge in countering Sybil attacks. Even worse, they create a new target for                                 
Sybil attacks, enabling attackers to pocket the subsidy in addition to any other gains. By                             
enabling subscription payments as alternative to per-transaction fees, the Orbs platform limits                       
the bounty one can find in such a Sybil attack, and the costs can only be laid on the digital                                       
service - who is the only party in power to mitigate such attacks.  

Ever-Growing Storage 
A big cost factor in current generation blockchain platforms is the fact that resources often                             
scale without correlation to actual technical requirements. On Ethereum, for example, there                       
would be as many full copies of the blockchain storage as the number of full nodes, and about                                   
as many processors running every piece of smart contract code. While distributed and                         
decentralized systems do require a certain level of redundancy in both execution and storage,                           
the proper redundancy for them would likely be constant, and in most cases not more than a                                 
dozen or two. Though fees are only paid to the solver of the PoW puzzle, all miners expect the                                     
mining operation to be cash-flow positive, so in equilibrium the fees would offset the total                             

61 



costs for all miners. The architecture of the Orbs platform assures redundancy of any                           
component is within determined bounds.  

Storage is a cost generator in another sense. Orbs storage APIs natively define expiration for                             
data, as well as explicit expiration blockchain history. This ensures that data has a defined                             
(rather than infinite) time to live, and greatly reduces storage costs to a magnitude expected in                               
cloud services. In addition, relying on consensus that provides finality allows the Orbs platform                           
to maintain the state under consensus and removes the need for high bandwidth access to                             
block storage. 

Light Clients 
As indicated in our discussion about ​network entities​, consumers will access the network                         
primarily by using mobile apps and websites. These usage patterns are characterized by                         
extremely low availability of resources, thus requiring a thin client implementation that is                         
commonly referred to in the industry as a ​light client​. These clients do not synchronize over                               
the entire blockchain history like a full fledged node and usually must maintain some                           
relationship of trust with the node serving them as gateway. 

The need to trust a gateway node creates a dependency of the client on the node’s honest                                 
behavior and enables vulnerabilities such as man in the middle attacks. In order to mitigate                             
the risks, some clients perform a partial validation of the state by validating block headers.                             
Another common strategy is validating data by querying multiple nodes, which of course                         
doesn’t scale well. The problem is even more significant when a client needs to query a smart                                 
contract, as it requires the client to trust a node that runs this smart contract on its behalf. 

We see value in providing light clients that can operate with a low level of trust in a gateway                                     
node. This capability is provided over the Orbs platform using ​network owned secrets​. Going                           
back to the smart contract example, the client will provide the contract address and                           
arguments to a gateway node, which will perform the query and return a signed response. The                               
light client will be able to validate the signature of the network as a whole, thus reducing the                                   
level of trust needed from the specific gateway. An additional aspect of the Orbs platform that                               
reduces the need for a light client to trust a node is that the protocol guarantees fairness in                                   
transaction ordering. By transmitting encrypted pre-consensus transactions that are opaque                   
to consensus nodes, we can ensure that transactions will be ordered for execution without                           
censorship or bias. 

Separation of Ordering and Validation 
The Orbs platform relies on multiple strategies to increase scalability by several orders of                           
magnitude in order to meet the requirements of mass market consumer apps. Beyond the                           
careful selection of a consensus strategy that favors professional nodes that are incentivized                         
towards maintaining high SLAs regarding connection speed, uptime and processing power,                     

62 



several other strategies are incorporated into the platform. The first strategy is separating                         
consensus ordering and validation. 

The validation process of transactions and smart contracts is expensive and incurs duplicate                         
computational cost since it has to run over multiple nodes. When validation and ordering are                             
performed sequentially, transaction throughput is limited by the overall time required for the                         
completion of both. Separating the two creates a ​pipeline​, thus increasing overall throughput. 

In addition to improvements in throughput, validation of ordered transactions is an easier                         
problem which permits simpler schemes for concurrent computation. Moreover, it allows the                       
network to reduce the amount of consensus nodes required for validation, thus promoting                         
better resource utilization overall. 

Many existing blockchain implementations perform validation and ordering sequentially.                 
Nodes normally execute all transactions first to validate their output and only then propose a                             
block comprised entirely of valid transactions. Separation techniques are used by few                       
state-of-the-art implementations like Hyperledger-fabric , where a transaction is first sent to a                       69

group of endorsers that execute it and return proposed responses. When enough endorser                         
responses are collected, the transaction is forwarded to the consensus ordering service.                       
Performing validation before ordering works well for some applications. However, for                     

69 ​http://hyperledger-fabric.readthedocs.io/en/release/arch-deep-dive.html 

63 

http://hyperledger-fabric.readthedocs.io/en/release/arch-deep-dive.html


 

consumer applications we see a benefit in performing ordering first on encrypted                       
transactions, in order to guarantee fairness. 

Efficient Consensus via Committees 
The second strategy used by the Orbs platform to increase scalability involves reducing the                           
number of nodes directly participating in the consensus process. This is important since in                           
most consensus algorithms, message complexity grows quadratically with the number of                     
nodes. If we plan to scale the network to a large number of validators, an important goal for                                   
security and decentralization, it is certainly desirable that performance will remain within                       
reasonable bounds. 

An efficient method for reducing dependency on the total number of nodes is relying on                             
smaller ​committees for consensus. If we randomize committee members between consensus                     
rounds, e.g. on every new block, we can prevent an attacker from knowing which nodes to                               
attack. The randomization process must fulfill several properties to make sure membership                       
cannot be manipulated in advance or else we risk compromising the security of the entire                             
model. The process is discussed in detail in the technical white paper for the ​Helix Consensus                               
Algorithm​. 

 

 

 

   

64 



Sharding via Blockchain Virtualization 
In systems engineering, scaling systems cannot always be achieved by adding more                       
resources, due to bottlenecks that cannot grow easily. Sharding is a technique for scaling out                             
systems by dividing them into smaller, nearly-independent parts called ​shards​, each small                       
enough to work well despite bottlenecks. Decentralized consensus is an unavoidable                     
bottleneck; the Orbs platform decouples tenants to different shards allowing the network to                         
scale out horizontally as new tenant apps are added. Contrary to centralized infrastructure                         
solutions like AWS, simply adding resources is usually not enough to increase capacity. When                           
the number of products that use AWS grows, increasing infrastructure capacity by adding                         
hardware like servers and network connections, is usually enough to meet demand since                         
separate products run completely separately. 

This normally isn’t the case with blockchain. Transactions on Ethereum, for example, even by                           
different contracts, may affect one another and therefore must be performed in sequence. To                           
make matters worse, the number of verifiers in PoW blockchains is related to the level of                               
security the blockchain enjoys; reducing unit sizes by sharding is reducing the level of security                             
in the same proportion. Significant efforts are invested in research and development of                         
effective sharding techniques in Ethereum. This problem is apparently much simpler to solve                         
in the proposed architecture for Orbs. Permissioned consensus models, especially when                     
employing consensus committees, do not weaken its security properties when sharded.                     
Different decentralized consumer apps are independent and work with different unrelated                     
assets. This is particularly true if fees are paid in bulk and not per transaction. By sharding                                 
decentralized apps by default, the architecture can revolve around parallelization. 

The Orbs infrastructure is designed to support a large number of independent consumer                         
applications running on top. While applications are independent from one another by design,                         
when running on top of a shared infrastructure they enjoy the benefits of sharing resources,                             
but still allow the system to scale out thanks to the natural sharding of virtual chains. 

The 3 types of cost factors in blockchain applications are consensus rounds, reads and writes                             
of state storage, and compute operations. Consensus on transactions of different virtual                       
chains can run independently as long as there are no ordering dependencies among them.                           
Therefore, consensus of different virtual chains can be sharded and run concurrently on                         
separate resources. As there is no ordering requirement, the ledgers of virtual chains can also                             
be maintained independently. Compute scheduling requires that dependent transactions will                   
be executed in order. As virtual chains have independent ordering, their compute can be                           
performed in parallel. Moreover, the isolation of state for each virtual chain reduces the                           
memory requirements of its virtual machine. 

65 



Elastic Capacity 
Consumer applications require an ever-growing increase in transaction rate, accounts and                     
storage. Moreover, as additional applications use the infrastructure, there’s a need for higher                         
resources capacity. No transaction rate, compute, or storage resources, as large as they may                           
be, that are allocated initially, can meet future requirements. In order to meet future capacity                             
recruitments, there is a need for elastic capacity.  

Elastic capacity requires that the architecture will enable blockchain components - such as                         
consensus, compute or storage - to scale with the addition of resources. Moreover, on-the-fly                           
updates in resource allocation should be performed without interruption to the operation of                         
decentralized applications. 

When an application requires additional resources in a centralized system, their capacity can                         
be adjusted by a system administrator by providing additional resources, virtual or physical.                         
For a decentralized infrastrastructure, there is a need for a decentralized mechanism for                         
resource allocation. In addition, there is a need for an incentive mechanism for the nodes to                               
provide the resources that are required by the applications. 

66 



Consumer Protection and Regulation 

Regulatory Evolution 
In his 2006 book Code v2 , Lawrence Lessig observes a pattern in which societies that                             70

emerged into a free, unregulated and anarchic state, grow to create the institutions, the                           
structures and the constraints that rule them. Lessig shows how this pattern applies to the                             
evolution of the Internet, and how invisible powers shape these institutions; left to their own                             
devices, those powers may end up stifling the freedom and progress that could exist. 

Bitcoin was introduced 3 years after Lessig published Code v2, and the crypto state has                             
followed precisely the path he laid out. At first, blockchain presented itself as an architecture                             
of freedom: unregulatable, self-ordering, free from control. As it matures, new structures                       
emerge, forming the architecture of the ever-growing blockchain society. But the invisible                       
hand in forming this architecture is not neutral. Established companies and distinguished and                         
important members of the crypto community are the drivers of much of the innovation in the                               
industry; this may create a force that will steer progress towards constructs that enable                           
monopolistic control of markets. Governments, frequently out of genuine desire to protect                       
users, use the crude power of law to shape the interfaces of blockchain with the “old world”;                                 
this may steer progress towards constructs that enable more control of the platform. It is up                               
to the designers of blockchain protocols to assure the architecture we’re forming is one of                             
freedom and progress. 

Established Consumer Brands 
Through our work with design partners that have established brands outside of the blockchain                           
domain, we observed the stark difference between their preferences to those of companies                         
operating entirely inside of it. Typically, the former have millions of existing users and ongoing                             
business operations that are expected to maintain their performance. As a result, they are                           
particularly concerned with the risks of regulatory uncertainty associated with blockchain                     
operations, perceiving the possibility of an encounter with regulators as one that puts their                           

70 ​http://codev2.cc/download+remix/Lessig-Codev2.pdf 

67 

CONSUMER PROTECTION AND REGULATION

http://codev2.cc/download+remix/Lessig-Codev2.pdf


 

existing business at risk. Blockchain companies, on the other hand, tend to see this                           
uncertainty as a natural state for a new industry - let alone one that introduces disruptive                               
business paradigms - and ignore it as an industry risk. 

Not derogating from the importance of pure blockchain companies and their remarkable                       
contribution to the ecosystem, we believe it is wrong for platforms to ignore the newcomers’                             
concerns in this case. For blockchain technologies to become mainstream, it is vital that                           
established companies enter the field with their existing user bases. These companies cannot                         
afford the legal uncertainty, and it is up to platforms to enable protocols that can comply with                                 
existing regulatory requirements. 

Consumer Protection 
Suppose an app developer wants their app to enable users to store or transfer valuable                             
assets. This could be peer-to-peer payments, trade of virtual goods, payment for services and                           
so on. The product engineering challenge is not big: the developer can choose from a plethora                               
of industrial grade transactional databases, and put together a straightforward                   
implementation of a ledger. But once the assets transferred are convertible to cash, new types                             
of problems arise: this ledger becomes a big target for thieves, crackers and embezzlers, and                             
anybody with access to it is at risk of being liable for damages or criminal accusations. Good                                 
protection against these risks is an elusive goal. In some contexts, someone in control of the                               
ledger can even make profit in subtle and indirect methods, such as delaying or deleting                             
transactions.  

For a business whose core competency is consumer applications, properly protecting its                       
users is a big burden. In many cases it could force the company to alter its procedures and                                   
structure in ways that will make it harder for it to go about its usual business. Most prefer to                                     
avoid such features if they’re not their main product focus, or integrate 3rd-party solutions to                             
provide such risky services. 

To some extent, blockchain technologies have the potential to lower the barrier to provide                           
such risky services, thanks to its reliance on secure cryptographic protocols and                       
decentralization that mitigate or completely neutralize that risk. 

Decentralized Ledger Security 
Decentralized implementations for a ledger are easier to secure because the burden of                         
securing the ledger is shared between multiple independent entities. When there is no                         
centralized ownership or governance, no single entity can control the ledger and jeopardize it if                             
it becomes compromised. Simply put, if nobody is in control of the ledger, nobody is able to                                 
steal off of it. In addition, multiple parties constantly audit the integrity of the ledger and can                                 
identify discrepancies from the agreed upon protocol. 

68 



In established PoW platforms such as Bitcoin or Ethereum, in a typical transaction, Alice                           
sends some value to Bob by transmitting a transaction (signed with Alice’s private key) in                             
which ownership registration of a certain amount of token will be modified on the shared                             
ledger to reflect the transfer. The signed transaction is propagated across the peer-to-peer                         
network and reaches miners who verify its validity, and if valid, include it in a block candidate.                                 
Each miner then looks for a solution to the PoW puzzle on the block candidate. Eventually, one                                 
miner will solve the puzzle and publish the closed block. Other miners receive the closed block,                               
check its validity, and, if valid, use it as the previous block for their future block candidates. 

Let's see whether validators are in control of the virtual currency, which means the validators                             
have sufficient credentials or authority to execute unilaterally or indefinitely prevent                     
transactions for a user . Mallory, a malicious miner, can simply prevent a transaction for                           71

users by not including their transactions in the block candidates; however she cannot block it                             
indefinitely because other miners should eventually include it in their blocks. Could she                         
execute a transaction unilaterally? Without Alice’s private key, Mallory cannot create a valid                         
proof that she has the authority to move value to Bob. But Mallory can create a block                                 
candidate that includes an invalid transaction moving Alice’s funds to herself, and with some                           
work can solve the PoW puzzle and get that block closed and published. Miners of future                               
blocks are supposed to validate Mallory’s block and disqualify it from being included in the                             
blockchain because it contains an invalid transaction. Note that in both cases, what limits                           
Mallory from wrongdoing is knowing that an undefined, random group of future miners will not                             
confirm her blocks’ validity. 

In the case of Bitcoin and Ethereum, we see two properties that together assure the validators                               
are not in control of the ledger: the cryptographic protocol makes it impossible for validators                             
to send transactions unilaterally, and the openness of the network makes it impossible for                           
validators to indefinitely prevent transactions.  

The cryptographic protocol defines what valid transactions are, in a deterministic and                       
universally accepted fashion. This means that if invalid transactions are included in a block,                           
and the network consensus is to accept the block, then this consensus is not following the                               
protocol and in essence it is not a consensus of the Bitcoin or Ethereum network. If we allow                                   
ourselves to use some circular logic, we could say that if Bitcoin accepts invalid blocks, then                               
it’s not Bitcoin anymore. 

The openness of the network is provided by the ability of anyone to join the network as a                                   
validator. If Alice suspects her transactions are censored by the network’s validators, she may                           
join the network as a validator and approve her own transaction. Because her block is valid,                               
future block validators should include it in their chain (as said before, if they’re not following                               
the protocol, it’s not the same network).  

71 ​https://coincenter.org/entry/when-does-a-company-actually-control-customer-bitcoins 

69 

https://coincenter.org/entry/when-does-a-company-actually-control-customer-bitcoins


 

Censorship and Front-running 
Relying on the openness of the protocol for combating censorship of transactions is not ideal                             
in some real-world uses. Though miners cannot indefinitely prevent a user from transacting, a                           
miner closing a block can arbitrarily choose to leave transactions out, delaying them to a                             
future block closed by another miner. This power is significant in the hands of large mining                               
pool leaders.  

Moreover, miners can choose the order in which transactions are placed in blocks, and even                             
craft transactions that will manipulate them for financial gain. For example, suppose we have                           
a smart contract implementing a two-sided trading market in which a certain class of assets                             
are traded for a currency. At a certain time, Alice posts a “bid” for an asset, for a maximum                                     
price of 100 tokens. Bob posts an “ask” for the same asset, for a minimum price of 90 tokens.                                     
A fair trading contract will split the spread and commit the trade for 95 tokens, leaving both                                 
Bob and Alice with surplus of 5 tokens. But Mallory, the miner who will close the block, can                                   
then add two more transactions: prepend Bob’s transaction with a “bid” for a maximum price                             
of 90 tokens, and append it with a transaction containing an “ask” with a minimum price of                                 
100 tokens. The new sequence of transactions will cause the smart contract to sell Bob’s                             
asset to Mallory for 90 tokens and then sell it to Alice for 100, leaving the entire surplus of 10                                       
tokens in her hands. A similar scenario, albeit in a more complex setting, was proposed by                               
Emin Gun Sirer as theoretical attack against the Bancor smart contract . 72

 

However, we maintain that the challenge of combating manipulation by miners can be tackled                           
with more adequate tools than openness. A consensus protocol in which validators agree on                           
the order of transactions without knowing their contents could assure that validators don’t                         
have knowledge they can use for manipulations such as censorship and front-running. Such                         

72 ​http://hackingdistributed.com/2017/06/19/bancor-is-flawed/#front-running 

70 

http://hackingdistributed.com/2017/06/19/bancor-is-flawed/#front-running


 

protocols, like HoneyBadger BFT , were proposed. A similar scheme is used in the Helix                           73

protocol. 

Compliance Protocols 
A common problem in dealing with blockchain assets is conformance to the requirements of                           
regulation on ownership, custodianship and transfers of assets. 

One class of international regulation that current cryptocurrency facilities struggle to comply                       
with is Anti-Money-Laundering regulation (AML). AML regulation has been adopted globally in                       
the past two decades and is seen as a systemic measure to combat crime and terrorism, by                                 
eliminating the financial incentives for criminal actions and the funding of terrorism. AML                         
regulation that applies to financial institutions requires that asset owners be identified and                         
their identity recorded, that sources of money transfers be verified, that large or anomalous                           
transfers of money be reported to enforcement agencies, etc. Value transfers on                       
cryptocurrency platforms do not conform with AML standards of financial institutions, which                       
sometimes prevent the financial institution’s ability to register the transaction. For example,                       
some institutions require deposits to be associated with a payment and for the source of the                               
payment to be proven legal. In virtual currencies in which payers are anonymous, it may be                               
hard or even impossible to prove the legitimacy of the transaction. 

Another asset class whose management entails regulatory requirements are securities. In                     
many jurisdictions, securities law requires ownership of securities to be properly registered; if                         
ownership of an asset by a single individual exceeds a threshold, it may also require reporting.                               
Some assets may be limited in the ability to be owned by individuals, such as private                               
companies whose equity can only be shared by a small number of unaccredited investors. 

We intend to develop a framework of interfaces and smart contracts to allow representing                           
common asset classes on the blockchain, with the intention of it being compatible with local                             
regulation, including protocols that allow trading of assets between localities when the legal                         
framework allows for that.  

Privacy and AML 
An interesting challenge is brought about when designing new protocols for a payment ledger                           
that can be used in normal circumstances and interface with traditional financial institutions.                         
On the one hand, consumers expect a high level of privacy from financial platforms; in                             
blockchain platforms that aim to be a major payments method for their users, this will require                               
a very high level of privacy. In many countries, this expectation is made mandatory by privacy                               
laws. On the other hand, existing AML regulation requires significant compromises on user                         
privacy. In traditional financial institutions, records are kept discreetly and so the institution                         

73 ​https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/199.pdf 

71 

https://eprint.iacr.org/2016/199.pdf


can maintain users’ privacy towards the public eye, while exposing all information to                         
enforcement agencies.  

It is important to make the distinction between existing regulation and long-term enforcement                         
strategy. Many enforcement agencies acknowledge that the transparency that a shared global                       
ledger provides is a powerful tool for identifying anomalies, suspicious transactions and                       
problematic accounts. Regulations that force virtual currencies to comply with procedures                     
that make sense in traditional banking diminish both the commercial and the enforcement                         
advantages of newer technologies. We believe that in time, regulators and enforcement                       
agencies will prefer protocols that are more suited to the nature of virtual currencies and                             
blockchain and are better at safeguarding users’ privacy.  

Our intention is to make an effort on both fronts: design our payment protocols to comply as                                 
much as possible with any existing regulation which may apply; and to design novel,                           
forward-looking protocols, that can provide users with superior privacy and law agencies with                         
sufficient tools to combat crime. 

The White Chain 
As one can expect, not all transactions and not all use cases will see value in conforming to                                   
the protocols. For example, apps that only use small payments that are exempt, or apps that                               
predate the release of such protocols, are likely to choose not to adopt them. A payment                               
ledger may contain both types of accounts and a mix of conforming and non-conforming                           
transactions. And naturally, some businesses will limit their transactions to be only on the                           
“white-chain” of strictly conformant accounts. 

72 



Modern Deployment Paradigms 

Network Governance 
In the past two decades, software engineering methods shifted away from long cycles of                           
design, implementation and testing to ever-shorter cycles, up to the point where                       
high-frequency of fine-grained releases are the industry standard in development of back-end                       
servers for mass-market apps. Google , Facebook , Amazon (and in particular AWS) are the                         74 75 76

most prominent examples of a near-unanimous agreement that frequent software releases                     
enable higher quality of deployed software, fewer deployment problems, faster response to                       
bugs in production and enable faster development.  

For decentralized apps, backend servers are replaced by blockchain. However, governance                     
models of current-generation blockchain platforms are incompatible with methodologies that                   
rely on frequent, fine-grained software release cycles. Mass-market applications developed for                     
or migrating into decentralized architecture must compromise on their development methods,                     
forcing them to a position of disadvantage in their competition with their centralized                         
opponents. 

We’re designing the Orbs platform to aim for continuous integration and continuous delivery                         
on the application back-end. That applies both to backend endpoints, to smart contracts, and                           
to the platform core. Naturally, decentralization creates barriers to quick acceptance of                       
changes. Our approach combines fine-grained definitions of the deployment procedures of                     
each component with economic incentives for quorum members on testing and deploying                       
changes rapidly, and disincentives for lingering, as well as for carelessness. Fine-grained                       
definition of the procedures refers both to the form of the procedure (for example,                           
implementation optimizations to an endpoint may be tested and deployed by every quorum                         
member separately; changes to protocols need to be in consensus before any implementation                         
is deployed; and so on) and the participants. The participants involved in different governance                           
procedures may vary based on the nature of the procedure. Some changes need to be                             

74 ​http://eclipsecon.org/2013/sites/eclipsecon.org.2013/files/2013-03-24 CI at Google Scale.pdf 
75 ​https://code.facebook.com/posts/270314900139291/rapid-release-at-massive-scale/ 
76 ​https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dxk8b9rSKOo 

73 

MODERN DEPLOYMENT PARADIGMS

http://eclipsecon.org/2013/sites/eclipsecon.org.2013/files/2013-03-24%20Continuous%20Integration%20at%20Google%20Scale.pdf
https://code.facebook.com/posts/270314900139291/rapid-release-at-massive-scale/
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=dxk8b9rSKOo


accepted by Orbs federation members, some by a virtual chain’s parties of interest; some                           
changes, mostly in smart contracts relating to decentralized applications, may require a                       
referendum of the affected users, etc. The economic incentives for involvement are applied by                           
altering a node’s reputation scores, which determine the pricing it could charge for its                           
services. 

Evergreen Nodes 
An important aspect of high-frequency deployments is that each change is small enough to be                             
quickly reviewed and tested, and perhaps more important, to gain full confidence in its                           
robustness soon after it is used in production. As changes propagate quickly across the                           
network from nodes that are risk-takers to nodes that are relatively risk-averse, outdated code                           
can be deprecated early, reducing security risks and system complexity. 

This behavior is not simple to implement in consensus-based decentralized systems where                       
nodes are operated by independent organizations. Examining historic behavior of systems like                       
Bitcoin is not encouraging, where several proposed changes like SegWit2X have shown that                         77

consensus among participants is not always simple to achieve. The danger of a lack of                             
consensus in this case is that the network is under risk of splitting, where some nodes reject a                                   
proposed protocol change while the others adopt it and fork outside. 

Projects like Tezos have been discussing the question of governance extensively and                       78

proposing several mechanisms to make its process of consensus more streamlined. We                       
believe that these mechanisms are important, but they are not enough if the fundamental                           
cohesion of the network is fragile. This is usually the case when network politics create                             
different pressure groups whose interests are misaligned and guided by opposing incentives.                       
Taking the question of fees as an example, miners are usually in favor of keeping fees high,                                 
naturally because fees provide their means of compensation. Users, on the other hand, are                           
usually in favor of reducing fees as much as possible, as long as they retain the same quality                                   
of service. The most important design decision towards easing the consensus process is                         
eliminating opposing interests by assembling the network from similar players that share the                         
same general motivations and view of the world. In the case of the Orbs platform, as the                                 
target audience of the network is consumer applications, choosing a consensus algorithm                       
that allows these same consumer applications to become efficient miners, goes a long way. 

Further incentivization towards fast resolution of governance questions can also be applied                       
through economic means. The node reputation system maintained by the ​Helix Consensus                       
Algorithm allows for simple implementation of incentives, since reputation score controls the                       
voting power of a node in the consensus process and the pricing it could charge for its share                                   
of the fees thereafter. We want to incentivize nodes to vote quickly on making a new protocol                                 
version official. This can be done by reducing the reputation of those who linger. We want to                                 

77 ​https://www.coindesk.com/2x-called-off-bitcoin-hard-fork-suspended-lack-consensus/ 
78 ​https://www.tezos.com/static/papers/white_paper.pdf 

74 

https://www.coindesk.com/2x-called-off-bitcoin-hard-fork-suspended-lack-consensus/
https://www.tezos.com/static/papers/white_paper.pdf


incentivize nodes to upgrade to the latest version of the protocol which is under consensus.                             
This can be done by reducing the reputation of those who fail to do so - slowly at first, when                                       
the new protocol versions are still backwards compatible, but more aggressively when the                         
older versions approach end of life. The voting mechanisms for governance purposes in the                           
Orbs platform are implemented as smart contracts. 

Another important mechanism for reducing friction is providing an outlet for changes that are                           
important only for a small part of the network. Consider a modification that is only required by                                 
one of the consumer brands participating in the ecosystem. If this change is not important to                               
anyone else, or even worse, impacts performance in a negative way for those who don’t need                               
it, its contributor may find it difficult to bring it to consensus. This issue is resolved on the Orbs                                     
platform by allowing protocol modifications to apply to a specific virtual chain only. In this                             
case, the consumer app requiring the modification would limit its effects to a voluntary                           
configuration that is only enabled in the dedicated virtual chain it is renting from other nodes.                               
This would eliminate most of the reasons for the other participants to oppose to the change. 

Gradual Migrations 
Once a core protocol change has been agreed upon, the question of its methodology of                             
deployment still exists. Migrating the entire network at once, a process often seen in Bitcoin                             
protocol modifications, holds substantial risk. What happens if unforeseen problems arise                     
only after deployment to production? It is almost impossible to guarantee that all                         
malfunctions will be identified in advance by testing and simulation. 

Almost all changes can be deployed gradually, enabling the developers and chain                       
administrators to gain confidence in its correctness based on actual performance rather than                         
estimates (reviews, simulations, tests, etc). Using the method of Blue/Green Deployments ,                     79

when changes are entering the production system, the entire network clones and directs                         
traffic to both the unchanged (blue) and changed (green) code. Processed traffic can then be                             
considered either live or in testing; essentially every transaction is processed on both                         
environments, but the “live” transactions are committed to the permanent storage and the                         
“test” transactions are only tested to verify that they are correct and maintain a set of                               
predetermined key performance indicators (KPIs) as compared to the live environment. The                       
deployment process starts with a period in which the entire “green” traffic is in testing, then                               
split 90%-10%, 50%-50% and 0%-100%. Each such change can be approved by its developer or                             
by consensus, after checking performance KPIs of both systems. Another benefit of this                         
methodology is the ability to rollback and return to the blue system in case a major                               
malfunction is discovered. 

This gradual process of migration can also be used in order to migrate from a previous                               
blockchain solution like Ethereum to Orbs in a risk free manner. Consider a secondary token,                             

79 ​https://martinfowler.com/bliki/BlueGreenDeployment.html 

75 

https://martinfowler.com/bliki/BlueGreenDeployment.html


 

TOK, that was originally launched on top of the Ethereum blockchain. Let’s assume that the                             
time comes and TOK is ready to migrate from Ethereum to Orbs. Naturally, performing a full                               
migration at once holds risk. Instead, we propose a softer, risk-free migration. The TOK client                             
SDK used by consumer apps that support the token will start ​mirroring all transactions                           
performed by end users to Orbs in parallel to Ethereum. All writes will take place to both                                 
blockchains, creating a duplicate ledger for TOK on top of the Orbs platform. This ledger can                               
constantly be audited and compared to the Ethereum ledger which is considered the source of                             
truth. Initially, TOK clients perform business decisions based on the Ethereum reads, but this                           
can be changed per user with a runtime feature toggle. To start the migration, this feature                               
toggle is switched for 5% of users. If everything is alright, 50% and finally 100%. If a problem is                                     
discovered, the feature toggle can be switched back and all users will return to making their                               
business decisions based on Ethereum. Since all writes are duplicated, there is no risk of                             
losing the ability to rollback. 

Upgradable Contracts 
Once deployed, smart contracts are immutable in nature and cannot be updated. After all,                           
what’s the point of a contract if one of the parties can change it single-handedly after it has                                   
been signed? Although this behavior is a feature of smart contracts, immutability poses a lot                             
of practical concerns. Developers are known to make mistakes and every piece of software                           
always has another bug yet to be discovered. What happens if such a bug is discovered in an                                   
immutable smart contract? 

This problem is similar in nature to the governance problem of updating protocol versions of                             
the node codebase. We’ve resolved the questions of protocol updates using consensus. Once                         
a majority of parties has agreed to upgrade the protocol to a new version, we can start                                 
enforcing the upgrade throughout the network. It makes sense to resolve the upgrades of                           
smart contacts in a similar fashion. Smart contracts over the Orbs platform are encouraged to                             
employ an upgrade strategy. This strategy is implemented as another smart contact and                         
controls the process through which the contract can be upgraded. Contracts for secondary                         
tokens can elect to upgrade based on a stake-weighted vote of all holders of the token. 

Multi Chain Hybrids 
Practical design concerns of real-world decentralized applications often require that we base                       
the complete solution on multiple blockchain infrastructures running side by side. Consider                       
the following challenge we’ve met while collaborating on Kin with Kik Interactive. The Kin                           
token was launched on the Ethereum blockchain, which was at the time the de facto standard                               
for raising funds as part of an ICO (Initial Coin Offering). Ethereum has a great ecosystem and                                 
secondary tokens based on its ERC20 standard are easily integrated into exchanges, third                         
party wallets and hardware wallets such as Trezor. On the other hand, Ethereum also has                             
severe limitations on transaction scale caused by high fees, network congestion and low                         

76 



transaction throughput. The inability to scale Kin on top of Ethereum has led the project to                               
consider a migration of the tokens to another blockchain infrastructure. 

The difficulty with this plan was that the scalable blockchain solutions considered as an                           
alternative to Ethereum did not have the same well integrated ecosystem. Performing a                         
one-way migration to them would jeopardize the ability of some parties to integrate with the                             
token. Instead, a better strategy would be to base the Kin token on a hybrid solution of two                                   
blockchains. The first blockchain would be Ethereum, used primarily for its extensive                       
ecosystem of integrations. The second blockchain would be a scalable solution like the Orbs                           
platform. These would be two different implementations of the ​same token. Users would be                           
able to perform a 1:1 swap of tokens between the two implementations and the total amount                               
of circulating tokens on both implementations would always equal the original number of                         
tokens created during the Kin ICO. 

77 



Polyglot Cross-Chain Contracts 
It seems that often a better strategy to a one-way migration between token implementations                           
is the addition of a new implementation in parallel. This would provide us with a hybrid                               
solution relying on multiple different blockchains at the same time. Strategy such as this                           
introduces a significant technological challenge - how would we combine multiple different                       
blockchains into one solution? How would they communicate? 

Traditionally, smart contracts are limited in their ability to access external sources and can                           
only rely on data existing on the blockchain itself. Such is the case with Ethereum contracts                               
for example. This limitation is not surprising because smart contracts operate within a closed                           
system of trust. External data, provided by an entity often labeled as an ​oracle​, simply cannot                               
be trusted like the data stored on chain. 

The Orbs platform overcomes this inherent limitation of smart contracts by introducing                       
cross-chain contracts​. These smart contracts running on top of Orbs can read data from other                             
blockchains in a secure and trusted way. Just like a smart contract can read variables from                               
the secure on-chain Orbs storage, the smart contract can also read a variable from Ethereum.                             
This expansion opens up an exciting new class of decentralized applications. Applications that                         
can span multiple blockchains and choose the most appropriate one to hold every piece of its                               
data. Another interesting ability made possible with this technology is to seamlessly import                         
smart contracts developed originally for other blockchains directly into the Orbs platform.                       
Consider a system of smart contracts originally designed for Ethereum. Normally, to migrate it                           
to another blockchain infrastructure would require a complete rewrite. The Orbs platform is                         
able to run these existing smart contracts almost as is. 

Accordingly, the Orbs platform is designed to support the execution of multiple languages of                           
smart contracts. The most popular smart contract language today for smart contracts is                         
Ethereum Solidity . As decentralized applications become mainstream, forcing engineers to                   80

transition to specialized languages for smart contract development creates undeniable                   
friction. Orbs’ design supports the development of smart contracts using common and                       
widespread languages such as Python, Java and JavaScript, thus lowering the barrier of                         
development for established brands even further. Because Orbs has lower redundancy of                       
smart contract execution it is okay for the accounting to be loose compared to platforms like                               
Ethereum. This means that it is not limited to languages that compile to custom bytecodes                             
such as Solidity and EVM, which can bill code execution accurate to the opcode level. 

80 ​https://solidity.readthedocs.io/en/develop/ 

78 

https://solidity.readthedocs.io/en/develop/


Designing for Consumers 

Brands and Trust 
In our discussion about consensus we have observed that we cannot practically design a                           
decentralized system for consumers that is completely trustless. This is different from the                         
decentralized ideal behind systems like Bitcoin, where end users are theoretically expected to                         
verify that the client software they use conforms to the protocol by reviewing its source code                               
and compiling it by themselves. Even if an end user downloads a precompiled binary, they are                               
at least theoretically expected to validate that the signature of this binary matches the                           
community consensus. 

We can assume that the typical consumer is uneducated about cryptocurrencies and these                         
extreme security measures. They are probably not looking to use decentralized consumer                       
products for the idealistic benefits that decentralization and trustlessness provide.                   
Decentralization is a design choice made by applications. Consumers that are using an                         
application are normally unaware whether the application is decentralized or not. 

We can therefore assume that the relationship between a consumer and the brand providing                           
the product that the consumer is using involves ​trust​. If such a brand would abuse the trust                                 
placed in it by its users, for example by leaking secrets like private keys that users must                                 
provide to client apps, its image and reputation will suffer the consequences in addition to any                               
legal ramifications. 

Mobile and Web Clients 
The delivery mechanisms that can bring a consumer product today to the hands of millions of                               
end users are agnostic as to whether this product is decentralized or not. Consumers are                             
using mobile and web clients almost exclusively. This is different from the primary vehicle for                             
systems like Bitcoin, where end users are theoretically expected to run a client that is also a                                 
full fledged node. Only after synchronizing the entire block history can the client truly trust that                               
its perception of state is accurate. 

79 

DESIGNING FOR CONSUMERS



Mobile and web clients do not have this privilege. Storing the entire block history requires                             
significant storage space and the synchronization process takes a long time and ample                         
bandwidth . The resource constraints of mobile and web clients are too severe to make this                             81

practical. Therefore, when designing a blockchain system for consumers, we can only rely on                           
what the industry refers to as ​light clients​. Such clients connect to one or more ​full nodes                                 
which they can query to read blockchain data or send transactions through. Though they                           
employ some heuristic proofs of the validity of the data they are getting, they do expect to                                 
have a certain degree of trust with the nodes they connect to. Orbs mechanisms such as                               
Ordering of Opaque Transactions and ​Network Owned Secrets simplify the light client protocol                         
and can significantly reduce the required level of trust. 

Consumer Patterns of Network Access 
Consumers also have a typical pattern of network access that may influence infrastructure                         
design. Consumers are likely to access a single account from multiple devices concurrently.                         
For example, on the go they may rely on their mobile phone to access an app, in the office rely                                       
on their laptop and at home use a tablet to access the same app. 

Certain design decisions on the infrastructure layer can make the platform incompatible with                         
such patterns. Consider the use of ​nonce in transactions on Ethereum. The purpose of the                             
nonce is to assure uniqueness of a transaction and make sure the network does not process                               
the same transaction twice. Ethereum clients need to put sequential numbering in the nonce                           
field that increments on every transaction sent from an account. Ethereum relies on this                           
numbering and will not process a transaction until its predecessor is confirmed. This                         
mechanism is not suited for use by multiple devices concurrently, as the sequence numbering                           
needs to be synchronized across devices. We are working to avoid this complication entirely                           
by using a non-sequential mechanism to add uniqueness to transactions. This comes at a                           
cost of limiting client transactions to an explicit time window of execution, which is an                             
important feature by itself, giving end users a bound to how long a transaction can wait before                                 
being either processed or discarded. 

Another common access pattern by consumers is the transmission of multiple requests in                         
parallel instead of one after the other. Consider a peer-to-peer advertising platform where a                           
group chat user shares an advertisement with the entire group. If the user needs to reward all                                 
group members for receiving the content, they would probably transmit multiple transactions                       
in parallel. On Ethereum, confirmation time for each transaction can take 15 seconds . How is                             82

the nonce calculated in this case? A standard implementation would be to increment the                           
nonce on the client-side and send all transactions in parallel with sequential nonce numbers.                           
Now, assume that one of the transactions failed for some reason. The platform would not                             
process the subsequent transactions because a transaction having the first unused nonce                       

81 ​https://ethereum.stackexchange.com/questions/143/what-are-the-ethereum-disk-space-needs 
82 ​https://etherscan.io/chart/blocktime 

80 

https://ethereum.stackexchange.com/questions/143/what-are-the-ethereum-disk-space-needs
https://etherscan.io/chart/blocktime


 

was not confirmed. This edge condition is once again circumvented on the Orbs platform by                             
using a non-sequential mechanism. 

Infrastructure Implications of Churn 
Churn, short for ​churn rate​, is a measure of the number of individuals or items moving out of a                                     
collective group over a specific period. When applied to consumer applications, churn refers to                           
the proportion of end users who leave and stop using the product during a given time period.                                 
This may be to due to a variety of reasons like customer dissatisfaction, better alternatives                             
from competition, disappearance amongst the noise and a generally shrinking attention span. 

Churn is a fact of life in the consumer space. It is not uncommon for consumer products to                                   
lose the vast majority of their user base to churn. Figures like 5% of all registered users are                                   
active in a given month are within the norm and illustrate just how severe the phenomenon is. 

When the decentralized app being developed involves a token that consumers use, churn is                           
likely to dictate how distribution behaves over time. As the number of users lost to churn                               
increases monotonously, so does the number of tokens left inaccessible inside the wallets                         
that they possessed. Since the supply of such tokens is often limited, we may discover                             
eventually that the majority of tokens end up locked forever out of circulation. This is                             
problematic from another aspect as well, since the bootstrap of such token economies usually                           
relies on stimulus in the form of subsidies - where large amounts of tokens are distributed to                                 
groups of consumers in order to spark a critical mass of use. We may discover that the bulk of                                     
the amount used for subsidies ends up in the hands of users who will never use it. 

Careful design of the token protocol layer can go a long way towards dealing with churn                               
gracefully. We’ll show this with a simplified example. Suppose that the token smart contracts                           
allow recycling of introductory subsidies back to the subsidizing body, in case the wallet was                             
not used in the 12 months following the subsidy. This behavior, although crude, will eliminate                             
the problem of churn quite effectively. Normally, giving someone the permission to reclaim                         
funds out of a user’s account creates a risk of embezzlement. But in this case the rules for                                   
recycling are clear and transparent, and enforced by a decentralized smart contract, so                         
nobody is in control of the users’ funds. 

Consumer Apps and Open Source 
Blockchain solutions, such as the Orbs platform, are normally open source and have a                           
permissive intellectual property policy. Nevertheless, there are dozens of different open source                       
licenses and the particular choice of license may affect how applicable it is for the consumer                               
app use case. 

Consumer brands can be very particular about their use of open source licenses. Any open                             
source technology used by these brands must be careful to allow them to protect their assets,                               

81 



 

particularly, reliance on the GPL family of open source licenses may impact a brand’s ability                             83

to incorporate this code in a closed source asset such as its mobile app. This family of                                 
licenses is popular in many blockchain projects like Ethereum. GPL licenses are ​copyleft​,                         
meaning that software that is derived from GPL-licensed code is required to adopt the same                             
license. If a closed source app, for example, is using a GPL-licensed library, it is in risk of being                                     
required to open source itself - a legal liability that most brands will not accept. 

The Orbs platform has a clear open source policy and relies within its ecosystem only on the                                 
MIT license . This is one of the most permissive open source licenses available which                           84

explicitly makes no impact on consumer apps and their commercial assets. Unlike GPL,                         
MIT-licensed software can be used in commercial closed source applications without any                       
limitation. 

The Problem of Private Keys 
Cryptocurrencies have yet to penetrate the mainstream consumer market. For comparison,                     
Facebook, one of the top consumer products today, has a reach of over 2 billion users                               
worldwide . The total number of users worldwide who have ever operated a cryptocurrency                         85

wallet is only estimated under 20 million . This gap stems from a multitude of reasons, one of                                 86

which is a severe technical barrier of entry. 

Access to a cryptocurrency wallet is synonymous with knowing a single secret - the wallet’s                             
private key​. This key is immutable and cannot be recovered if lost. In order to protect the                                 
wallet against attempts to guess the key with brute force, a high degree of entropy is                               
commonly used; Bitcoin wallets, for example, use 256 bit keys.  

Safeguarding such private keys from being stolen or lost is not an easy task. Consumers are                               
not capable of maintaining the procedures required to manage and protect strong                       
cryptographic keys as large organizations do, and do only moderately well with simple                         
authentication methods, such as passwords, PIN codes, recovery questions, biometrics etc.                     
Simple authentications by themselves are not safe for protecting valuable assets, such as                         
identities or large funds, and are usually used as part of an authentication protocol that                             
includes actions in the “real world”, such as delays, fallback between different authentication                         
challenges (for example, try PIN code, or fall back to security questions), multi-factor                         
authentication, access notifications, timelocks, and more. Current technology only enables                   
such protocols to be executed on centralized repositories (i.e. a bank’s computer system can                           
enforce a delay between failed PIN code entry attempts, but decentralized blockchains                       
cannot). 

83 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/GNU_General_Public_License 
84 ​https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MIT_License 
85 ​https://newsroom.fb.com/company-info/ 
86 ​http://jbs.cam.ac.uk/faculty-research/centres/alternative-finance/publications/global-cryptocurrency 

82 

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/GNU_General_Public_License
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MIT_License
https://newsroom.fb.com/company-info/
https://jbs.cam.ac.uk/faculty-research/centres/alternative-finance/publications/global-cryptocurrency


Decentralized Secret Bearing 
One of the unique novelties in the Orbs platform is that it enables the platform to store and                                   
use secrets, particularly secret cryptographic keys. This is done using novel protocols that                         
make use of secret sharing and threshold cryptography, enabling operations like signing or                         
decrypting a document with the decentrally-stored key. This functionality opens the door to a                           
plethora of interesting business cases: signing a blockchain’s state with a single canonical                         
signature, signing transactions to be executed on other blockchains, notarizing the state of                         
other (connected) blockchains, signing API calls for 3rd-party infrastructure, and many more. 

An interesting use-case for decentralized secret bearing is saving cryptographically-strong                   
private keys in a decentralized way and enforcing a secure authentication protocol which may                           
include delays, multi-factor authentication and other methods popular with consumers - on a                         
decentralized platform. 

Full details about this mechanism are published in a separate technical white paper. 

83 



The Orbs Federation 

The network built around the Orbs platform is envisioned as a community of ecosystem                           
participants, primarily comprised of organizations that make the target audience of Orbs -                         
decentralized consumer businesses and established consumer brands transitioning into                 
blockchain. For example, organizations like PumaPay, Zinc or Kin and companies like                       
ironSource and Kik Interactive. This collection of organizations and companies is aligned as                         
independent but equal members of a ​federation​. 

The primary roles of members in the Orbs federation include: 

● Operating ​consensus nodes in the network and actively participating in the consensus                     
process. 

● Contributing to the open source development of Orbs and evolving the platform over                       
time as their own requirements come to light. 

● Providing decentralized governance for the platform such as reaching consensus over                   
core updates to the protocol. 

Pre-launch Design Partners 
The Orbs platform is initially designed in a requirements-driven approach through close work                         
with a set of ​design partners​. The production requirements of these design partners shape the                             
iterative process by which the system is designed. The initial design partners also act as the                               
founding members of the Orbs federation and operate the first set of consensus nodes. This                             
first set also acts as the first customers of the platform and the developers of the first                                 
decentralized applications that run on top of it. 

The collaboration process with design partners is designed to be completely open and                         
transparent. All insights learned in the process are published on public channels for the benefit                             
of the Orbs community. The Orbs reference implementation codebase is an open source                         
project maintained publicly on GitHub . The code is provided with the permissive MIT license                           87

87 ​https://github.com/orbs-network 

84 

 THE ORBS FEDERATION

https://github.com/orbs-network


 

for free public use. New members of the Orbs ecosystem are encouraged to contribute to the                               
codebase and become active members of the Orbs federation by running nodes. 

The role of the Orbs project is kicking off this new ecosystem. The initial design is proposed to                                   
the Orbs community by publishing this position paper and a set of technical white papers, and                               
by providing the first reference open source implementation for the community to build on.                           
When the protocol is well defined, the platform can launch. This initial design also provides the                               
scaffold for decentralized governance which will steer the platform once the federation is                         
formed. True to its decentralized nature, the platform will not be governed by a single entity                               
like the Orbs project and its founding team. Beyond a leadership role in the early days of                                 
pre-launch, the Orbs project will not be involved in ongoing governance but will continue                           
research and development in the field, like other participants, and propose protocol                       
modifications for the federation to evaluate. 

Governance 
The model of a federation has been established in the industry and demonstrated in principle                             
in projects like Stellar and Ripple. Contrary to a ​consortium​, where a centralized governing                           
body adds each chosen member to the collective, a ​federation has no point of centralized                             
governance. Organizations and companies can join the collective by approaching some of the                         
existing members and asking them for sponsorship. Once a new member is designated by                           
other members, they gain their initial status. 

One of the primary roles of a federation member is operating a consensus node. A consensus                               
node is elected to participate in the consensus process of a virtual chain at random times; one                                 
consensus node may find itself participating in the consensus of various virtual chains at any                             
minute. The measure of a node’s influence over consensus and its ability to validate                           
transactions is governed by the protocol. The protocol incentivizes several behaviors for                       
nodes, such as maintaining a high SLA, which manifests during the consensus process as the                             
node’s ​reputation and is defined in a decentralized manner by the consensus of nodes in the                               
network. The reputation also takes into account each node’s participation in evaluating and                         
agreeing on protocol upgrades. This enables the Orbs platform to keep on evolving and                           
provide its users with state-of-the-art blockchain technologies.   

85 



 

NOTE: THIS POSITION PAPER PROVIDES AN INITIAL SUMMARY OF CERTAIN BUSINESS AND                       
TECHNOLOGY ESSENTIALS UNDERLYING THE ORBS PROJECT AND PLATFORM. THIS                 
DOCUMENT IS EXPECTED TO EVOLVE OVER TIME, AS THE PROJECT AND THE                       
DEVELOPMENT OF THE ORBS PLATFORM PROCEEDS, AND THE ORBS PROJECT MAY POST                       
MODIFICATIONS, REVISIONS AND/OR UPDATED DRAFTS FROM TIME TO TIME. 

Definitions 
This position paper uses certain defined terms, as follows - 

● “Orbs ecosystem” - a general term referring to combination of the Orbs platform                         
providing core services, together with third party infrastructure developers providing                   
services over the infrastructure marketplace; as described in the section labeled “The                       
Orbs Ecosystem”. 

● “Orbs federation” - a collection of ecosystem participants providing decentralized                   
governance to the platform and operating consensus nodes; as described in the                       
section labeled “The Orbs Federation”. 

● “Orbs platform” / “Orbs” - a decentralized network governed by the Orbs federation                         
providing infrastructure as a service to applications; as described in the section labeled                         
“The Orbs Platform”. 

● “Orbs project” / “we” - Orbs Ltd. and its shareholders, officers, employees and                         
consultants, constituting together the founding team writing this paper and publishing                     
the initial design of the protocol, as well as the scaffold for decentralized governance                           
which will steer the platform once the federation is formed. 

● “ORBS token” / “Orbs token” - the token fueling the platform which is used primarily by                               
application developers to pay for infrastructure fees; as described in the section                       
labeled “The ORBS Token”. 

   

86 



Legal Disclaimer 
This position paper is for information purposes only and may be subject to change. We cannot                               
guarantee the accuracy of the statements made or conclusions reached in this position paper                           
and we expressly disclaim all representations and warranties (whether express or implied by                         
statute or otherwise) whatsoever, including but not limited to:  

● any representations or warranties relating to merchantability, fitness for a particular                   
purpose, suitability, title or non-infringement; 

● that the contents of this document are accurate and free from any errors; and
● that such contents do not infringe any third party rights.

We shall have no liability for losses or damages (whether direct, indirect, consequential or any                             
other kind of loss or damage) arising out of the use, reference to or reliance on the contents of                                     
this position paper, even if advised of the possibility of damages arising. 

This position paper may contain references to third party data and industry publications. As                           
far as we are aware, the information reproduced in this position paper is accurate and that the                                 
estimates and assumptions contained herein are reasonable. However, we offer no                     
assurances as to the accuracy or completeness of this data. Although information and data                           
reproduced in this position paper are believed to have been obtained from reliable sources, we                             
have not independently verified any of the information or data from third party sources                           
referred to in this position paper or ascertained the underlying assumptions relied upon by                           
such sources. 

The information contained in this position paper is intended for informative purposes only and                           
shall not form the basis of, or be relied upon in connection with, any offer or commitment                                 
whatsoever in any jurisdiction, including (without limitation) the United States or the State of                           
Israel. The information contained herein shall not constitute or form part of, and should not be                               
construed as, any offer for sale or subscription of, or solicitation of any offer to buy or                                 
subscribe for tokens issued by Orbs Ltd. or any products or services offered by Orbs Ltd. Any                                 
offer to acquire ORBS tokens will be made, and any customer should make his or its purchase                                 
decision, solely on the basis of the information that will be contained in the applicable                             
agreement made between Orbs Ltd. and eligible token purchasers. 

No promises of future performance or value are or will be made with respect to the Orbs                                 
platform and/or ORBS tokens, including no promise of inherent value, no promise of any                           
payments, and no guarantee that the Orbs platform and/or ORBS tokens will hold any                           
particular value. Unless prospective participants fully understand and accept the nature of the                         
Orbs platform and the potential risks associated with the use of the Orbs platform and the                               
acquisition, storage and transfer of ORBS tokens, they should not use the Orbs platform or                             
purchase, acquire or otherwise obtain or use any ORBS tokens.  

This position paper does not constitute a prospectus or disclosure document and is not an                             
offer to sell, nor the solicitation of any offer to buy any investment or financial instrument in                                 

87 



any jurisdiction. ORBS tokens should not be acquired for speculative or investment purposes                         
with the expectation of making an investment return.  

No regulatory authority has examined or approved any of the information set out in this                             
position paper. No such action has or will be taken under the laws, regulatory requirements or                               
rules of any jurisdiction. The publication, distribution or dissemination of this position paper                         
does not imply that applicable laws or regulatory requirements have been complied with.  

The Orbs platform and/or ORBS tokens could be impacted by regulatory action, including                         
potential restrictions on the ownership, use, or possession of such tokens. Regulators or other                           
competent authorities may demand that we revise the mechanics of the token allocation                         
and/or the functionality of Orbs platform in order to comply with regulatory requirements or                           
other governmental or business obligations. Nevertheless, we believe we are taking                     
commercially reasonable steps to ensure that the operation of the Orbs platform and the                           
token allocation mechanics do not violate applicable laws and regulations. 

This position paper contains forward-looking statements or information (collectively                 
“forward-looking statements”) that relate to our current expectations of future events. In some                         
cases, these forward-looking statements can be identified by words or phrases such as “may”,                           
“will”, “expect”, “anticipate”, “aim”, “estimate”, “intend”, “plan”, “seek”, “believe”, “potential”,                   
“continue”, “is/are likely to” or the negative of these terms, or other similar expressions                           
intended to identify forward-looking statements. We have based these forward-looking                   
statements on current projections about future events and financial trends that we believe are                           
relevant to the operation of the Orbs platform.  

In addition to statements relating to the matters set out here, this position paper contains                             
forward-looking statements related to the Orbs platform’s proposed operating model. The                     
model speaks to our objectives only, and is not a forecast, projection or prediction of future                               
results of operations. The platform operation and development is reliant on the formation of                           
the Orbs federation. We are unable to guarantee that sufficient members will join the                           
federation to support and realize the intended design in its entirety. 

Forward-looking statements are based on certain assumptions and analysis made by Orbs                       
project team in light of its experience and perception of historical trends, current conditions                           
and expected future developments and other factors we believes are appropriate, and are                         
subject to risks and uncertainties. Although the forward-looking statements contained in this                       
position paper are based upon what we believe are reasonable assumptions, there are risks,                           
uncertainties, assumptions, and other factors which could cause our actual results,                     
performances, achievements and/or experiences to differ materially from the expectations                   
expressed, implied, or perceived in forward-looking statements. Given such risks, you should                       
not place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements. 

88 




